Massachusetts, session 194th, H1754.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 93L the 
2 following chapter:- 
3  Chapter 93M 
4  Internet Bill of Rights 
5  Section 1. As used in this chapter the following terms shall, unless the context clearly 
6 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:  
7  “Binding corporate rules”, personal data protection policies adhered to by a controller or 
8 processor established in the commonwealth for transfers or a set of transfers of personal data to a 

2 of 81 9 controller or processor in 1 or more locations outside the commonwealth within a group of 
10 undertakings, or group of enterprises engaged in a joint economic activity. 
11  “Biometric data”, personal data resulting from specific technical processing relating to 
12 the physical, physiological or behavioral characteristics of a natural person that allows or 
13 confirms the unique identification of the natural person, such as facial images or dactyloscopic 
14 data. 
15  “Consent”, any freely given, specific, informed and unambiguous indication of a data 
16 subject's wishes by which the data subject, by a statement or by a clear affirmative action, 
17 signifies agreement to the processing of personal data relating to the data subject. 
18  “Controller”, the natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, 
19 alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal 
20 data; provided, that where the purposes and means of processing are determined by general or 
21 special law, the controller or the specific criteria for its nomination may be provided for by 
22 general or special law. 
23  “Cross-border processing”, either: (i) processing of personal data that takes place in the 
24 context of the activities of establishments in the commonwealth and 1 or more locations outside 
25 the commonwealth of a controller or processor in the commonwealth where the controller or 
26 processor is established in the commonwealth and 1 or more locations outside the 
27 commonwealth; or (ii) processing of personal data that takes place in the context of the activities 
28 of a single establishment of a controller or processor in the commonwealth but which 
29 substantially affects or is likely to substantially affect data subjects in the commonwealth and 1 
30 or more locations outside the commonwealth. 

3 of 81 31  “Data concerning health”, personal data related to the physical or mental health of a 
32 natural person, including the provision of health care services, that reveals information about the 
33 person’s health status. 
34  “Data subject”, an identified or identifiable natural person.  
35  “Enterprise”, a natural or legal person engaged in an economic activity, irrespective of 
36 the person’s legal form, including partnerships or associations regularly engaged in an economic 
37 activity. 
38  “Filing system”, any structured set of personal data that is accessible according to 
39 specific criteria, whether centralized, decentralized or dispersed on a functional or geographical 
40 basis. 
41  “Foreign destination”, another state, a foreign country, a territory of the United States or 
42 a foreign country or an organization located outside the commonwealth. 
43  “Genetic data”, personal data relating to the inherited or acquired genetic characteristics 
44 of a natural person that gives unique information about the physiology or the health of the natural 
45 person and which result, in particular, from an analysis of a biological sample from the natural 
46 person. 
47  “Group of undertakings”, a controlling undertaking and its controlled undertakings. 
48  “Identifiable natural person”, a natural person who may be identified, directly or 
49 indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, 
50 location data, an online identifier or to 1 or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, 
51 genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person. 

4 of 81 52  “Information society service”, any service normally provided for remuneration, without 
53 the parties being simultaneously present, by electronic means and at the individual request of a 
54 recipient of services. A service shall be deemed provided by electronic means if the service is 
55 sent initially and received at the service’s destination by means of electronic equipment for the 
56 processing, including digital compression, and storage of data, and entirely transmitted, 
57 conveyed and received by wire, by radio, by optical means or by other electromagnetic means. 
58   “International organization”, an organization and the organization’s subordinate bodies 
59 governed by public international law, or any other body which is set up by, or on the basis of, an 
60 agreement between 2 or more countries. 
61  “Joint controllers”, 2 or more controllers that jointly determine the purposes and means of 
62 processing.  
63  “Main establishment”, the place of a controller or processor’s central administration in 
64 the commonwealth; provided, however, that if the decisions on the purposes and means of the 
65 processing of personal data are taken in another establishment of the controller in the 
66 commonwealth and the latter establishment has the power to have such decisions implemented, 
67 the establishment having taken the decisions shall be considered to be the main establishment; 
68 and, provided further, that if a processor has no central administration in the commonwealth, the 
69 main establishment shall be the establishment of the processor in the commonwealth where the 
70 main processing activities in the context of the activities of an establishment of the processor 
71 take place, to the extent that the processor is subject to specific obligations under this chapter. 
72  “Personal data”, any information relating to a data subject. 

5 of 81 73  “Personal data breach”, a breach of security leading to the accidental or unlawful 
74 destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, personal data transmitted, 
75 stored or otherwise processed. 
76  “Processing”, any operation or set of operations that is performed on personal data or on 
77 sets of personal data, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, 
78 organization, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure 
79 by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, 
80 restriction, erasure or destruction. 
81  “Processor”, a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body that 
82 processes personal data on behalf of a controller. 
83  “Profiling”, any form of automated processing of personal data consisting of the use of 
84 personal data to evaluate certain personal aspects relating to a natural person, in particular to 
85 analyze or predict aspects concerning that natural person's performance at work, economic 
86 situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location or movements. 
87  “Pseudonymization”, the processing of personal data in such a manner that the personal 
88 data can no longer be attributed to a specific data subject without the use of additional 
89 information; provided, that the additional information is kept separately and is subject to 
90 technical and organizational measures to ensure that the personal data is not attributed to a data 
91 subject. 
92  “Recipient”, a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or another body, to which 
93 personal data is disclosed, whether a third party or not; provided, however, that public authorities 
94 that receive personal data in the framework of a particular inquiry in accordance with general or 

6 of 81 95 special law shall not be regarded as recipients and the processing of data by said public 
96 authorities shall be in compliance with the applicable data protection rules according to the 
97 purposes of the processing. 
98  “Relevant and reasoned objection”, an objection to a draft decision as to whether there is 
99 an infringement of this chapter, or whether envisaged action in relation to the controller or 
100 processor complies with this chapter, which clearly demonstrates the significance of the risks 
101 posed by the draft decision regarding the fundamental rights and freedoms of data subjects and, 
102 where applicable, the free flow of personal data within the commonwealth. 
103  “Representative”, a natural or legal person established in the commonwealth who, 
104 designated by the controller or processor in writing pursuant to section 21, represents the 
105 controller or processor with regard to the respective obligations of the controller or processor 
106 described in this chapter. 
107  “Restriction of processing”, the marking of stored personal data with the aim of limiting 
108 processing of the data in the future. 
109  “Third party”, a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or body other than the 
110 data subject, controller, processor and persons who, under the direct authority of the controller or 
111 processor, is authorized to process personal data. 
112  Section 2. (a) Natural persons shall be entitled to protections relative to the processing of 
113 personal data and the free movement of personal data. Natural persons possess a right to the 
114 protection of personal data.  The free movement of personal data within the commonwealth shall 
115 be neither restricted nor prohibited for reasons connected with the protection of natural persons 
116 with regard to the processing of personal data. 

7 of 81 117  (b) This chapter shall apply to the processing of personal data wholly or partly by 
118 automated means and to the processing other than by automated means of personal data which 
119 form part of a filing system or are intended to form part of a filing system. 
120  This chapter shall  not apply to the processing of personal data: (i) in the course of an 
121 activity that falls outside the scope of the commonwealth’s authority; (ii) by a natural person in 
122 the course of a purely personal or household activity; or (iii) by competent authorities for the 
123 purposes of the prevention, investigation, detection or prosecution of criminal offenses or the 
124 execution of criminal penalties, including the safeguarding against and the prevention of threats 
125 to public security. 
126  (c) This chapter shall apply to the processing of personal data in the context of the 
127 activities of an establishment of a controller or a processor in the commonwealth, regardless of 
128 whether the processing takes place in the commonwealth. 
129  (d) This chapter shall apply to the processing of personal data of data subjects who are in 
130 the commonwealth by a controller or processor not established in the commonwealth where the 
131 processing activities are related to: (i) the offering of goods or services, irrespective of whether a 
132 payment of the data subject is required, to data subjects in the commonwealth; or (ii) the 
133 monitoring of data subjects’ behavior as far as the behavior takes place within the 
134 commonwealth. 
135  Section 3. (a) Personal data shall be: (i) processed lawfully, fairly and in a transparent 
136 manner in relation to the data subject; (ii) collected only for specified, explicit and legitimate 
137 purposes and not further processed in a manner that is incompatible with those purposes; (iii) 
138 adequate, relevant and limited to what is necessary in relation to the purposes for which it is 

8 of 81 139 processed; (iv) accurate and, where necessary, kept up to date; (v) kept in a form that permits 
140 identification of data subjects for no longer than is necessary for the purposes for which the 
141 personal data is processed; and (vi) processed in a manner that ensures appropriate security of 
142 the personal data, including protection against unauthorized or unlawful processing and against 
143 accidental loss, destruction or damage, using appropriate technical or organizational measures. 
144  (b) The controller shall be responsible for, and be able to demonstrate compliance with, 
145 subsection (a).  
146  (c) Further processing for archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or historical 
147 research purposes or statistical purposes shall, in accordance with subsection (a) of section 62, 
148 not be considered to be incompatible with the initial purposes of collection described in clause 
149 (ii) of subsection (a). Personal data may be stored for longer than described in clause (v) of said 
150 subsection (a) if the personal data shall be processed solely for archiving purposes in the public 
151 interest, scientific or historical research purposes or statistical purposes in accordance with 
152 subsection (a) of section 62; provided, that the storage shall be subject to implementation of the 
153 appropriate technical and organizational measures required by this chapter in order to safeguard 
154 the rights and freedoms of the data subject. 
155  (d) Every reasonable step shall be taken to ensure that inaccurate personal data, having 
156 regard to the purposes for which it is processed, is erased or rectified without delay. 
157  Section 4. (a) Processing shall be legal only if and to the extent that at least 1 of the 
158 following applies:  
159  (i) the data subject has given consent to the processing of the data subject’s personal data 
160 for 1 or more specific purposes;  

9 of 81 161  (ii) processing is necessary for the performance of a contract to which the data subject is 
162 party or in order to take steps at the request of the data subject prior to entering into a contract;  
163  (iii) processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which the controller 
164 is subject;  
165  (iv) processing is necessary in order to protect the vital interests of the data subject or of 
166 another natural person;  
167  (v) processing is necessary for the performance of a task carried out in the public interest 
168 or in the exercise of official authority vested in the controller; or  
169  (vi) processing is necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by the 
170 controller or by a third party, except where such interests are overridden by the interests or 
171 fundamental rights and freedoms of the data subject that require protection of personal data, in 
172 particular where the data subject is a child; provided, however, that this clause shall not apply to 
173 processing carried out by public authorities in the performance of official tasks. 
174  (b) State agencies may maintain or introduce more specific provisions to adapt the 
175 application of the rules of this chapter with regard to processing for compliance with clauses (iii) 
176 and (v) of subsection (a) by determining more precisely specific requirements for the processing 
177 and other measures to ensure lawful and fair processing, including for other specific processing 
178 situations as provided for in sections 85 to 91, inclusive. 
179  (c) The basis for the processing described in clauses (iii) and (v) of subsection (a) shall be 
180 determined by the attorney general. 

10 of 81 181  The purpose of the processing shall be determined by the attorney general. The attorney 
182 general shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this chapter, including but 
183 not limited to regulations regarding: (i) the general conditions governing the lawfulness of 
184 processing by the controller; (ii) the types of data subject to the processing; (iii) the data subjects 
185 concerned; (iv) the entities to, and the purposes for which, the personal data may be disclosed; 
186 (v) the purpose limitation described in clause (ii) of subsection (a) of section 3; (vi) storage 
187 periods; and (vii) processing operations and processing procedures, including measures to ensure 
188 lawful and fair processing such as those for other specific processing situations as provided for in 
189 sections 85 to 91, inclusive. The regulations shall meet an objective of public interest and be 
190 proportionate to the legitimate aim pursued. 
191  Where the processing for a purpose other than that for which the personal data has been 
192 collected is not based on the data subject's consent, the controller shall, in order to ascertain 
193 whether processing for another purpose is compatible with the purpose for which the personal 
194 data was initially collected, consider: (1) any link between the purposes for which the personal 
195 data was collected and the purposes of the intended further processing; (2) the context in which 
196 the personal data was collected, in particular regarding the relationship between data subjects and 
197 the controller; (3) the nature of the personal data, in particular whether special categories of 
198 personal data is processed, pursuant to subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 6, or whether 
199 personal data related to criminal convictions and offenses is processed, pursuant to subsection (d) 
200 of said section 6; (4) the possible consequences of the intended further processing for data 
201 subjects; and (5) the existence of appropriate safeguards, which may include encryption or 
202 pseudonymization. 

11 of 81 203  Section 5. (a) Where processing is based on consent, the controller shall be able to 
204 demonstrate that the data subject consented to processing of the data’s subject’s personal data. 
205  (b) If the data subject's consent is given in the context of a written declaration which also 
206 concerns other matters, the request for consent shall be presented in a manner which is clearly 
207 distinguishable from the other matters, in an intelligible and easily accessible form, using clear 
208 and plain language. Any part of the declaration that constitutes a violation of this chapter shall 
209 not be binding. 
210  (c) A data subject shall have the right to withdraw the data subject’s consent at any time. 
211 The withdrawal of consent shall not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before 
212 the withdrawal. Prior to giving consent, the data subject shall be informed that the data subject is 
213 giving consent. Withdrawing consent shall be as easy as giving consent. 
214  (d) When assessing whether consent is freely given, consideration shall be given as to 
215 whether the performance of a contract, including the provision of a service, is conditional on 
216 consent to the processing of personal data that is not necessary for the performance of that 
217 contract. 
218  (e) Where clause (i) of subsection (a) of section 4 applies, in relation to the offer of 
219 information society services directly to a child, the processing of the personal data of a child 
220 shall be lawful where the child is at least 16 years old. Where the child is below the age of 16 
221 years, such processing shall be lawful only if and to the extent that consent is given or authorized 
222 by the holder of parental responsibility over the child. The controller shall make reasonable 
223 efforts to verify that consent is given or authorized by the holder of parental responsibility over 
224 the child, taking into consideration available technology. 

12 of 81 225  Section 6. (a) Processing of personal data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political 
226 opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership, and the processing of 
227 genetic data, biometric data for the purpose of uniquely identifying a natural person, data 
228 concerning health or data concerning a natural person's sex life or sexual orientation shall be 
229 prohibited. 
230  (b) Subsection (a) shall not apply if:  
231  (i) the data subject has given explicit consent to the processing of personal data for 1 or 
232 more specified purposes, except where general, special or federal law provides that the 
233 prohibition referred to in subsection (a) may not be lifted by the data subject;  
234  (ii) processing is necessary for the purposes of carrying out the obligations and exercising 
235 specific rights of the controller or of the data subject in the field of employment and social 
236 security and social protection law in so far as it is authorized by general, special or federal law or 
237 a collective agreement pursuant to a general or special law providing for appropriate safeguards 
238 for the fundamental rights and the interests of the data subject;  
239  (iii) processing is necessary to protect the vital interests of the data subject or of another 
240 natural person where the data subject is physically or legally incapable of giving consent;  
241  (iv) processing is carried out in the course of legitimate processing activities with 
242 appropriate safeguards by a foundation, association or other not-for-profit body with a political, 
243 philosophical, religious or trade union aim; provided, that the processing relates solely to the 
244 members or to former members of the body or to persons who have regular contact with the body 
245 in connection with the body’s purposes and that the personal data is not disclosed outside that 
246 body without the consent of the data subjects;  

13 of 81 247  (v) processing relates to personal data which is manifestly made public by the data 
248 subject;  
249  (vi) processing is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims or 
250 whenever courts are acting in their judicial capacity;  
251  (vii) processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest, on the basis of a 
252 general or special law that shall be proportionate to the aim pursued, respect the essence of the 
253 right to data protection and provide for suitable and specific measures to safeguard the 
254 fundamental rights and the interests of the data subject;  
255  (viii) processing is necessary for the purposes of: (1) preventive or occupational 
256 medicine; (2) the assessment of the working capacity of the employee; (3) medical diagnosis; (4) 
257 the provision of health or social care; or (5) treatment or the management of health or social care 
258 systems and services on the basis of general or special law;  
259  (ix) processing is necessary pursuant to contract with a health professional and subject to 
260 the conditions and safeguards described in subsection (c);  
261  (x) processing is necessary for reasons of public interest in the area of public health, 
262 including but not limited to protecting against serious threats to health or ensuring high standards 
263 of quality and safety of health care, on the basis of a general, special or federal law that provides 
264 for suitable and specific measures to safeguard the rights and freedoms of the data subject, in 
265 particular professional secrecy; or  
266  (xi) processing is necessary for archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or 
267 historical research purposes or statistical purposes in accordance with subsection (a) of section 

14 of 81 268 62 based on general or special law that shall be proportionate to the aim pursued, respect the 
269 essence of the right to data protection and provide for suitable and specific measures to safeguard 
270 the fundamental rights and the interests of the data subject. 
271  (c) Personal data referred to in subsection (a) may be processed for the purposes referred 
272 to in clauses (viii) and (ix) of subsection (b) when the data is processed by or under the 
273 responsibility of a professional subject to the obligation of professional secrecy pursuant to state 
274 or federal law or rules established by national competent bodies or by another person also subject 
275 to an obligation of secrecy under state or federal law or rules established by national competent 
276 bodies. 
277  State agencies may maintain or introduce further conditions, including limitations, with 
278 regard to the processing of genetic data, biometric data or data concerning health. 
279  (d) Processing of personal data relating to criminal convictions and offences or related 
280 security measures based on subsection (a) of section 4 shall be carried out only under the control 
281 of official authority or when the processing is authorized by general or special law providing for 
282 appropriate safeguards for the rights and freedoms of data subjects. Any comprehensive register 
283 of criminal convictions shall be kept only under the control of official authority. 
284  (e) If the purposes for which a controller processes personal data do not or do no longer 
285 require the identification of a data subject by the controller, the controller shall not be obliged to 
286 maintain, acquire or process additional information in order to identify the data subject for the 
287 sole purpose of complying with this chapter; provided, that if the controller is able to 
288 demonstrate that the controller is not in a position to identify the data subject, the controller shall 
289 inform the data subject accordingly, if possible; and, provided further, that sections 10 to 15, 

15 of 81 290 inclusive, shall not apply except where the data subject, for the purpose of exercising the data 
291 subject’s rights under said sections, provides additional information enabling the data subject’s 
292 identification. 
293  Section 7. (a) The controller shall take appropriate measures to provide any information 
294 referred to in sections 8 and 9 and any communication pursuant to sections 10 to 17, inclusive, 
295 and section 28 relating to processing to the data subject in a concise, transparent, intelligible and 
296 easily accessible form, using clear and plain language, in particular for any information 
297 addressed specifically to a child. The information shall be provided in writing, or by other 
298 means, including, where appropriate, by electronic means. When requested by the data subject, 
299 the information may be provided orally; provided, that the identity of the data subject is proven 
300 by other means. 
301  (b) The controller shall facilitate the exercise of data subject rights pursuant to sections 
302 10 to 17. In the cases referred to in subsection (e) of section 6, the controller shall not refuse to 
303 act on the request of the data subject for exercising the data subject’s rights pursuant to said 
304 sections 10 to 17, unless the controller demonstrates that the controller is not in a position to 
305 identify the data subject. 
306  (c) The controller shall provide information on action taken on a request pursuant to 
307 sections 10 to 17 to the data subject without undue delay and in any event within 1 month of 
308 receipt of the request; provided, however, that the period to provide information may be 
309 extended by 2 further months where necessary, taking into account the complexity and number 
310 of the requests. The controller shall inform the data subject of any extension within 1 month of 
311 receipt of the request, together with the reasons for the delay. Where the data subject makes the 

16 of 81 312 request by electronic form means, the information shall be provided by electronic means where 
313 possible, unless otherwise requested by the data subject. 
314  (d) If the controller does not take action on the request of the data subject, the controller 
315 shall inform the data subject without delay and at the latest within 1 month of receipt of the 
316 request of the reasons for not taking action and on the possibility of lodging a complaint with the 
317 attorney general and seeking a judicial remedy. 
318  (e) Information provided pursuant to sections 8 and 9 and any communication and any 
319 actions taken pursuant to sections 10 to 17, inclusive, and section 28 shall be provided free of 
320 charge. Where requests from a data subject are manifestly unfounded or excessive, in particular 
321 because of their repetitive character, the controller may: (i) charge a reasonable fee, taking into 
322 account the administrative costs of providing the information or communication or taking the 
323 action requested; or (ii) refuse to act on the request. The controller shall bear the burden of 
324 demonstrating the manifestly unfounded or excessive character of the request. 
325  (f) Notwithstanding subsection (e) of section 6, where the controller has reasonable 
326 doubts concerning the identity of the natural person making the request referred to in sections 10 
327 to 16, the controller may request the provision of additional information necessary to confirm the 
328 identity of the data subject. 
329  (g) The information to be provided to data subjects pursuant to sections 8 and 9 may be 
330 provided in combination with standardized icons in order to give in an easily visible, intelligible 
331 and clearly legible manner a meaningful overview of the intended processing. Where the icons 
332 are presented electronically, the icons shall be machine-readable. 

17 of 81 333  Section 8. (a) Where personal data relating to a data subject is collected from the data 
334 subject, the controller shall, at the time when personal data is obtained, provide the data subject 
335 with all of the following information: 
336  (i) the identity and the contact details of the controller and, where applicable, of the 
337 controller's representative; 
338  (ii) the contact details of the data protection officer, where applicable; 
339  (iii) the purposes of the processing for which the personal data is intended as well as the 
340 legal basis for the processing; 
341  (iv) where the processing is based on clause (vi) of subsection (a) of section 4, the 
342 legitimate interests pursued by the controller or by a third party; and 
343  (v) the recipients or categories of recipients of the personal data, if any. 
344  (vi) the period for which the personal data will be stored, or if that is not possible, the 
345 criteria used to determine that period; 
346  (vii) the existence of the right to request from the controller access to and rectification or 
347 erasure of personal data or restriction of processing concerning the data subject or to object to 
348 processing, as well as the right to data portability; 
349  (viii) where the processing is based on clause (i) of subsection (a) of section 4 or clause 
350 (i) of subsection (b) of section 6, the existence of the right to withdraw consent at any time, 
351 without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal; 
352  (ix) the right to lodge a complaint with the attorney general; 

18 of 81 353  (x) whether the provision of personal data is a statutory or contractual requirement, or a 
354 requirement necessary to enter into a contract, as well as whether the data subject is obliged to 
355 provide the personal data and of the possible consequences of failure to provide such data; and 
356  (xi) the existence of automated decision-making, including profiling, referred to in 
357 section 17 and, at least in those cases, meaningful information about the logic involved, as well 
358 as the significance and the predicted consequences of the processing for the data subject. 
359  (b) Where the controller intends to further process the personal data for a purpose other 
360 than that for which the personal data was collected, the controller shall provide the data subject 
361 prior to further processing with information on the other purpose and any relevant further 
362 information described in subsection (a). 
363  (c) Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply where and insofar as the data subject already 
364 has the information. 
365  Section 9. (a) Where personal data has not been obtained from the data subject, the 
366 controller shall provide the data subject with the following information: 
367  (i) the identity and the contact details of the controller and, where applicable, of the 
368 controller's representative; 
369  (ii) the contact details of the data protection officer, where applicable; 
370  (iii) the purposes of the processing for which the personal data is intended as well as the 
371 legal basis for the processing; 
372  (iv) the categories of personal data concerned;  

19 of 81 373  (v) the recipients or categories of recipients of the personal data, if any 
374  (vi) the period for which the personal data will be stored, or if that is not possible, the 
375 criteria used to determine that period; 
376  (vii) where the processing is based on clause (vi) of subsection (a) of section 4, the 
377 legitimate interests pursued by the controller or by a third party; 
378  (viii) the existence of the right to request from the controller access to and rectification or 
379 erasure of personal data or restriction of processing concerning the data subject and to object to 
380 processing as well as the right to data portability; 
381  (ix) where processing is based on clause (i) of subsection (a) of section 4 or clause (i) of 
382 subsection (b) of section 6, the existence of the right to withdraw consent at any time, without 
383 affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal; 
384  (x) the right to lodge a complaint with the attorney general; 
385  (xi) from which source the personal data originates and, if applicable, whether it came 
386 from publicly accessible sources; and 
387  (xii) the existence of automated decision-making, including profiling, referred to section 
388 17 and, at least in those cases, meaningful information about the logic involved, as well as the 
389 significance and the predicted consequences of the processing for the data subject. 
390  (b) The controller shall provide the information referred to in subsection (a) within a 
391 reasonable period after obtaining the personal data, but at the latest within 1 month, having 
392 regard to the specific circumstances in which the personal data is processed; provided, that if the 
393 personal data is to be used for communication with the data subject, the controller shall provide 

20 of 81 394 the information at the latest at the time of the first communication to that data subject; and 
395 provided further, that if a disclosure to another recipient is envisaged, the controller shall provide 
396 the information at the latest when the personal data is first disclosed. 
397  (c) Where the controller intends to further process the personal data for a purpose other 
398 than that for which the personal data was obtained, the controller shall provide the data subject 
399 prior to further processing with information on the other purpose and any relevant further 
400 information described in subsection (a). 
401  (d) Subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, shall not apply if: 
402  (i) the data subject already has the information; 
403  (ii) the provision of the information proves impossible or would involve a 
404 disproportionate effort, in particular for processing for archiving purposes in the public interest, 
405 scientific or historical research purposes or statistical purposes, subject to the conditions and 
406 safeguards referred to in subsection (a) of section 62 or in so far as the obligation referred to in 
407 subsection (a) is likely to render impossible or seriously impair the achievement of the objectives 
408 of the processing; provided, that the controller shall take appropriate measures to protect the data 
409 subject's rights and freedoms and legitimate interests, including making the information publicly 
410 available;  
411  (iii) obtaining or disclosure is expressly required by state or federal law to which the 
412 controller is subject and which provides appropriate measures to protect the data subject's 
413 legitimate interests; or 

21 of 81 414  (iv) where the personal data must remain confidential subject to an obligation of 
415 professional secrecy regulated by state or federal law, including a statutory obligation of secrecy. 
416  Section 10. (a) The data subject shall have the right to obtain from the controller 
417 confirmation as to whether or not personal data concerning the data subject is being processed. If 
418 personal data concerning the data subject is being processed, the data subject shall have the right 
419 to access:  
420  (i) the personal data; 
421  (ii) the purposes of the processing; 
422  (iii) the categories of personal data concerned; 
423  (iv) the recipients or categories of recipient to whom the personal data has been or will be 
424 disclosed, in particular recipients in foreign destinations; 
425  (v) where possible, the predicted period for which the personal data will be stored, or, if 
426 not possible, the criteria used to determine that period; 
427  (vi) the existence of the right to request from the controller rectification or erasure of 
428 personal data or restriction of processing of personal data concerning the data subject or to object 
429 to such processing; 
430  (vii) the right to lodge a complaint with the attorney general; 
431  (viii) where the personal data is not collected from the data subject, any available 
432 information as to the source of the personal data; and 

22 of 81 433  (ix) the existence of automated decision-making, including profiling, referred to in 
434 section 17 and, at least in those cases, meaningful information about the logic involved, as well 
435 as the significance and the predicted consequences of the processing for the data subject. 
436  (b) Where personal data is transferred to a foreign destination, the data subject shall have 
437 the right to be informed of the appropriate safeguards pursuant to section 40 relating to the 
438 transfer. 
439  (c) The controller shall provide a copy of the personal data undergoing processing. For 
440 any further copies requested by the data subject, the controller may charge a reasonable fee based 
441 on administrative costs. Where the data subject makes the request by electronic means, and 
442 unless otherwise requested by the data subject, the information shall be provided in a commonly 
443 used electronic form. The right to obtain a copy of personal data shall not adversely affect the 
444 rights and freedoms of others. 
445  Section 11. The data subject shall have the right to obtain from the controller without 
446 undue delay the rectification of inaccurate personal data concerning the data subject. Taking into 
447 account the purposes of the processing, the data subject shall have the right to have incomplete 
448 personal data completed, including by means of providing a supplementary statement. 
449  Section 12. (a) The data subject shall have the right to obtain from the controller the 
450 erasure of personal data concerning the data subject without undue delay and the controller shall 
451 have the obligation to erase personal data without undue delay if: 
452  (i) the personal data is no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which the 
453 personal data was collected or otherwise processed; 

23 of 81 454  (ii) the data subject withdraws consent on which the processing is based pursuant to 
455 clause (i) of subsection (a) of section 4 or clause (i) of subsection (b) of section 6, and there is no 
456 other legal ground for the processing; 
457  (iii) the data subject objects to the processing pursuant to subsection (a) of section 16 and 
458 there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing, or the data subject objects to the 
459 processing pursuant to subsection (b) of said section 16; 
460  (iv) the personal data was unlawfully processed; 
461  (v) the personal data must be erased for compliance with a legal obligation pursuant to 
462 state or federal law to which the controller is subject; or 
463  (vi) the personal data was collected in relation to the offer of information society services 
464 referred to in subsection (e) of section 5. 
465  (b) Where the controller has made personal data public and is obliged required by 
466 subsection (a) to erase the personal data, the controller, taking account of available technology 
467 and the cost of implementation, shall take reasonable steps, including technical measures, to 
468 inform controllers that are processing the personal data that the data subject has requested the 
469 erasure by the controllers of any links to, or copy or replication of, the personal data. 
470  (c) Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to the extent that processing is necessary for: 
471  (i) exercising the right of freedom of expression and information; 
472  (ii) compliance with a legal obligation that requires processing by state or federal law to 
473 which the controller is subject or for the performance of a task carried out in the public interest 
474 or in the exercise of official authority vested in the controller; 

24 of 81 475  (iii) reasons of public interest in the area of public health in accordance with clauses (viii) 
476 to (x), inclusive, of subsection (b) of section 6 and subsection (c) of said section 6; 
477  (iv) archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or historical research purposes or 
478 statistical purposes in accordance with subsection (a) of section 62 in so far as the right referred 
479 to in subsection (a) is likely to render impossible or seriously impair the achievement of the 
480 objectives of that processing; or 
481  (v) the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims. 
482  Section 13. (a) The data subject shall have the right to obtain from the controller 
483 restriction of processing if: 
484  (i) the accuracy of the personal data is contested by the data subject, for a period enabling 
485 the controller to verify the accuracy of the personal data; 
486  (ii) the processing is unlawful and the data subject opposes the erasure of the personal 
487 data and requests the restriction of the use of the personal data instead; 
488  (iii) the controller no longer needs the personal data for the purposes of the processing, 
489 but the personal data is required by the data subject for the establishment, exercise or defense of 
490 legal claims; or 
491  (iv) the data subject objected to processing pursuant to subsection (a) of section 16 
492 pending the verification of whether the legitimate grounds of the controller override those of the 
493 data subject. 
494  (b) Where processing has been restricted pursuant to subsection (a), the personal data 
495 shall, with the exception of storage, only be processed with the data subject's consent or for the 

25 of 81 496 establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims or for the protection of the rights of another 
497 natural or legal person or for reasons of important public interest of the commonwealth. 
498  (c) A data subject who obtained restriction of processing pursuant to subsection (a) shall 
499 be informed by the controller before the restriction of processing is lifted. 
500  Section 14. The controller shall communicate any rectification or erasure of personal data 
501 or restriction of processing carried out in accordance with section 11, subsection (a) of section 12 
502 and section 13 to each recipient to whom the personal data has been disclosed, unless 
503 communication proves impossible or involves disproportionate effort. The controller shall 
504 inform the data subject about recipients to which communication was impossible or involved 
505 disproportionate effort if the data subject requests the information. 
506  Section 15. (a) The data subject shall have the right to receive the personal data 
507 concerning the data subject, which the data subject provided to a controller, in a structured, 
508 commonly used and machine-readable format and have the right to transmit the data to another 
509 controller without hindrance from the controller to which the personal data was provided, if the 
510 processing is: (i) based on consent pursuant to clause (i) of subsection (a) of section 4 or clause 
511 (i) of subsection (b) of section 6 or on a contract pursuant to clause (ii) of subsection (a) of 
512 section 4; and (ii) carried out by automated means. 
513  In exercising the right to transmit data, the data subject shall have the right to have the 
514 personal data transmitted directly from 1 controller to another, where technically feasible. 
515  (b) The exercise of the right described in subsection (a) shall not prejudice section 12. 
516 The right described in subsection (a) shall not apply to processing necessary for the performance 
517 of a task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of official authority vested in the 

26 of 81 518 controller. The right described in subsection (a) shall not adversely affect the rights and freedoms 
519 of others. 
520  Section 16. (a) The data subject shall have the right to object, on grounds relating to the 
521 data subject’s particular situation, at any time to processing of personal data concerning the data 
522 subject that is based on clauses (v) or (vi) of subsection (a) of section 4, including profiling based 
523 on those provisions. The controller shall no longer process the personal data unless the controller 
524 demonstrates compelling legitimate grounds for the processing that override the interests, rights 
525 and freedoms of the data subject or for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims. 
526  (b) Where personal data is processed for direct marketing purposes, the data subject shall 
527 have the right to object at any time to processing of personal data concerning the data subject for 
528 the marketing, including profiling to the extent that the profiling is related to the marketing. 
529 Where the data subject objects to processing for direct marketing purposes, the personal data 
530 shall no longer be processed for the direct marketing purposes. 
531  (c) Not later than at the time of the first communication with the data subject, the right to 
532 object described in subsections (a) and (b) shall be explicitly brought to the attention of the data 
533 subject and shall be presented clearly and separately from any other information. 
534  (d) In the context of the use of information society services, the data subject may exercise 
535 the data subject’s right to object by automated means using technical specifications. 
536  (e) Where personal data is processed for scientific or historical research purposes or 
537 statistical purposes pursuant to subsection (a) of section 62, the data subject, on grounds relating 
538 to the data subject’s particular situation, shall have the right to object to processing of personal 

27 of 81 539 data concerning the data subject, unless the processing is necessary for the performance of a task 
540 carried out for reasons of public interest. 
541   Section 17. (a) The data subject shall have the right not to be subject to a decision based 
542 solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning the 
543 data subject or similarly significantly affects the data subject. 
544  (b) Subsection (a) shall not apply if the decision is necessary for entering into, or 
545 performance of, a contract between the data subject and a data controller or based on the data 
546 subject's explicit consent; provided, that the data controller shall implement suitable measures to 
547 safeguard the data subject's rights and freedoms and legitimate interests, at least the right to 
548 obtain human intervention on the part of the controller, to express the data subject’s point of 
549 view and to contest the decision. 
550  (c) Subsection (a) shall not apply if the decision is authorized by state or federal law to 
551 which the controller is subject and which also lays down suitable measures to safeguard the data 
552 subject's rights and freedoms and legitimate interests; provided, that the decision shall not be 
553 based on special categories of personal data referred to in subsection (a) of section 6 unless 
554 clause (i) or (vi) of subsection (b) of said section 6 applies and suitable measures to safeguard the 
555 data subject's rights and freedoms and legitimate interests are in place. 
556  Section 18. (a) Taking into account the nature, scope, context and purposes of processing 
557 as well as the risks of varying likelihood and severity for the rights and freedoms of natural 
558 persons, the controller shall implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to 
559 ensure and to be able to demonstrate that processing is performed in accordance with this 
560 chapter. The measures shall be reviewed and updated where necessary. Where proportionate in 

28 of 81 561 relation to processing activities, the measures shall include the implementation of appropriate 
562 data protection policies by the controller. 
563  (b) Adherence to approved codes of conduct as referred to in section 34 or approved 
564 certification mechanisms as referred to in section 36 may be used as an element by which to 
565 demonstrate compliance with the obligations of the controller. 
566  Section 19. (a) Taking into account the state of the art, the cost of implementation and the 
567 nature, scope, context and purposes of processing as well as the risks of varying likelihood and 
568 severity for rights and freedoms of natural persons posed by the processing, the controller shall, 
569 both at the time of the determination of the means for processing and at the time of the 
570 processing itself, implement appropriate technical and organizational measures, such as 
571 pseudonymization, which are designed to implement data-protection principles, such as data 
572 minimization, in an effective manner and to integrate the necessary safeguards into the 
573 processing in order to meet the requirements of this chapter and protect the rights of data 
574 subjects. 
575  The controller shall implement appropriate technical and organizational measures for 
576 ensuring that, by default, only personal data which is necessary for each specific purpose of the 
577 processing is processed, including but not limited, to the amount of personal data collected, the 
578 extent of processing, the period of storage and accessibility to the data. In particular, the 
579 measures shall ensure that by default personal data is not made accessible without the 
580 individual's intervention to an indefinite number of natural persons. 
581  (b) An approved certification mechanism pursuant to section 36 may be used as an 
582 element to demonstrate compliance with subsection (a). 

29 of 81 583  Section 20. Joint controllers shall, in a transparent manner, determine the joint 
584 controllers’ respective responsibilities for compliance with the obligations pursuant to this 
585 chapter, in particular as regards the exercising of the rights of the data subject and the joint 
586 controllers’ respective duties to provide the information referred to in sections 8 and 9, by means 
587 of an arrangement between the joint controllers unless, and in so far as, the respective 
588 responsibilities of the controllers are determined by state or federal law to which the controllers 
589 are subject. The arrangement may designate a contact point for data subjects; provided, that the 
590 arrangement shall duly reflect the respective roles and relationships of the joint controllers vis-à-
591 vis the data subjects. The essence of the arrangement shall be made available to the data subject; 
592 and, provided further that the data subject may exercise the data subject’s rights pursuant to this 
593 chapter in respect of and against each of the controllers. 
594  Section 21. (a) Where subsection (d) of section 2 applies, the controller or the processor 
595 shall designate in writing a representative in the commonwealth. 
596  (b) Subsection (a) shall not apply to: (i) processing that is occasional, does not include, 
597 on a large scale, processing of special categories of data as referred to in subsection (a) of section 
598 6 or processing of personal data relating to criminal convictions and offenses referred to in 
599 subsection (d) of said section 6, and is unlikely to result in a risk to the rights and freedoms of 
600 natural persons, taking into account the nature, context, scope and purposes of the processing; or 
601 (ii) a public authority or body. 
602  (c) The representative shall be mandated by the controller or processor to be addressed in 
603 addition to or instead of the controller or the processor by, in particular, the attorney general and 

30 of 81 604 data subjects, on all issues related to processing, for the purposes of ensuring compliance with 
605 this chapter. 
606  (d) The designation of a representative by the controller or processor shall be without 
607 prejudice to legal actions which could be initiated against the controller or the processor 
608 themselves. 
609  Section 22. (a) Where processing is to be carried out on behalf of a controller, the 
610 controller shall use only processors providing sufficient guarantees to implement appropriate 
611 technical and organizational measures in such a manner that processing will meet the 
612 requirements of this chapter and ensure the protection of the rights of the data subject. 
613  (b) The processor shall not engage another processor without prior specific or general 
614 written authorization of the controller. In the case of general written authorization, the processor 
615 shall inform the controller of any intended changes concerning the addition or replacement of 
616 other processors, thereby giving the controller the opportunity to object to such changes. 
617  (c) Processing by a processor shall be governed by a contract or other legal act pursuant 
618 to state or federal law that is binding on the processor with regard to the controller and that sets 
619 out the subject-matter and duration of the processing, the nature and purpose of the processing, 
620 the type of personal data and categories of data subjects and the obligations and rights of the 
621 controller. The contract or other legal act shall stipulate, in particular, that the processor: 
622  (i) processes the personal data only on documented instructions from the controller, 
623 including with regard to transfers of personal data to foreign destinations, unless required to do 
624 so by state or federal law to which the processor is subject; provided, that, the processor shall 

31 of 81 625 inform the controller of the legal requirement before processing, unless the law prohibits the 
626 information on important grounds of public interest; 
627  (ii) ensures that persons authorized to process the personal data have committed 
628 themselves to confidentiality or are under an appropriate statutory obligation of confidentiality; 
629  (iii) takes all measures required pursuant to section 26; 
630  (iv) respects the conditions referred to in subsections (b) and (d) for engaging another 
631 processor; 
632  (v) taking into account the nature of the processing, assists the controller by appropriate 
633 technical and organizational measures, insofar as this is possible, for the fulfilment of the 
634 controller's obligation to respond to requests for exercising the data subject's rights described in 
635 sections 7 to 17, inclusive; 
636  (vi) assists the controller in ensuring compliance with the obligations pursuant to sections 
637 26 to 30, inclusive, taking into account the nature of processing and the information available to 
638 the processor; 
639  (vii) at the choice of the controller, deletes or returns all the personal data to the 
640 controller after the end of the provision of services relating to processing, and deletes existing 
641 copies unless state or federal law requires storage of the personal data; and 
642  (viii) makes available to the controller all information necessary to demonstrate 
643 compliance with the obligations laid down in this section and allow for and contribute to audits, 
644 including inspections, conducted by the controller or another auditor mandated by the controller; 

32 of 81 645 provided, that  the processor shall immediately inform the controller if, in its opinion, an 
646 instruction infringes this Chapter or other state or federal data protection provisions. 
647  (d) Where a processor engages another processor for carrying out specific processing 
648 activities on behalf of the controller, the same data protection obligations as set out in the 
649 contract or other legal act between the controller and the processor as referred to in subsection 
650 (c) shall be imposed on the other processor by way of a contract or other legal act pursuant to 
651 state or federal law, in particular providing sufficient guarantees to implement appropriate 
652 technical and organizational measures in such a manner that the processing will meet the 
653 requirements of this chapter. Where the other processor fails to fulfill said data protection 
654 obligations, the initial processor shall remain fully liable to the controller for the performance of 
655 the other processor's obligations. 
656  (e) Adherence of a processor to an approved code of conduct as referred to in section 34 
657 or an approved certification mechanism as referred to in section 36 may be used as an element by 
658 which to demonstrate sufficient guarantees as referred to in subsections (a) and (d). 
659  (f) Without prejudice to an individual contract between the controller and the processor, 
660 the contract or the other legal act referred to in subsections (b) and (c) may be based, in whole or 
661 in part, on standard contractual clauses referred to in subsection (g), including when they are part 
662 of a certification granted to the controller or processor pursuant to sections 36 and 37. 
663  (g) The attorney general may lay down standard contractual clauses for the matters 
664 referred to in subsections (c) and (d)). 
665  (h) The contract or the other legal act referred to in subsections (c) and (d) shall be in 
666 writing, including in electronic form. 

33 of 81 667  (i) Without prejudice to sections 55 to 57, inclusive, if a processor infringes this chapter 
668 by determining the purposes and means of processing, the processor shall be considered to be a 
669 controller in respect of that processing. 
670  Section 23.The processor and any person acting under the authority of the controller or of 
671 the processor, who has access to personal data, shall not process the data except on instructions 
672 from the controller, unless required to do so by state or federal law. 
673  Section 24. (a) Each controller and, where applicable, the controller's representative, shall 
674 maintain a record of processing activities under the responsibility of the controller or 
675 representative. The record shall contain: 
676  (i) the name and contact details of the controller and, where applicable, the joint 
677 controller, the controller's representative and the data protection officer; 
678  (ii) the purposes of the processing; 
679  (iii) a description of the categories of data subjects and of the categories of personal data; 
680  (iv) the categories of recipients to whom the personal data has been or will be disclosed 
681 including recipients in foreign destinations; 
682  (v) where applicable, transfers of personal data to foreign destinations, including the 
683 identification of that destination and, in the case of transfers referred to in the clause (ii) of 
684 subsection (a) of section 43, the documentation of suitable safeguards; 
685  (vi) where possible, the envisaged time limits for erasure of the different categories of 
686 data; and 

34 of 81 687  (vii) where possible, a general description of the technical and organizational security 
688 measures referred to in subsection (a) of section 26. 
689  (b) Each processor and, where applicable, the processor's representative shall maintain a 
690 record of all categories of processing activities carried out on behalf of a controller, containing: 
691  (i) the name and contact details of the processor or processors and of each controller on 
692 behalf of which the processor is acting, and, where applicable, of the controller's or the 
693 processor's representative, and the data protection officer; 
694  (ii) the categories of processing carried out on behalf of each controller; 
695  (iii) where applicable, transfers of personal data to foreign destinations, including the 
696 identification of that destination and, in the case of transfers referred to in the clause (ii) of 
697 subsection (a) of section 43, the documentation of suitable safeguards; and 
698  (iv) where possible, a general description of the technical and organizational security 
699 measures referred to in subsection (a) of section 26. 
700  (c) The records referred to in subsections (a) and (b) shall be in writing, including in 
701 electronic form. The controller or the processor and, where applicable, the controller's or the 
702 processor's representative, shall make the record available to the attorney general on request. 
703  (d) The obligations referred to in subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to an enterprise 
704 or an organization employing fewer than 250 persons unless the processing by the enterprise or 
705 an organization is likely to result in a risk to the rights and freedoms of data subjects, the 
706 processing is not occasional, or the processing includes special categories of data as referred to in 

35 of 81 707 subsection (a) of section 6 or personal data relating to criminal convictions and offences referred 
708 to in subsection (d) of said section 6. 
709  Section 25. The controller and the processor and, where applicable, representatives of the 
710 controller or processor, shall cooperate, on request, with the attorney general in the performance 
711 of the attorney general’s tasks pursuant to this chapter. 
712  Section 26. (a) Taking into account the state of the art, the costs of implementation and 
713 the nature, scope, context and purposes of processing as well as the risk of varying likelihood 
714 and severity for the rights and freedoms of natural persons, the controller and the processor shall 
715 implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to ensure a level of security 
716 appropriate to the risk, including, as appropriate: 
717  (i) the pseudonymization and encryption of personal data; 
718  (ii) the ability to ensure the ongoing confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience 
719 of processing systems and services; 
720  (iii) the ability to restore the availability and access to personal data in a timely manner in 
721 the event of a physical or technical incident; and 
722  (iv) a process for regularly testing, assessing and evaluating the effectiveness of technical 
723 and organizational measures for ensuring the security of the processing. 
724  (b) In assessing the appropriate level of security, account shall be taken in particular of 
725 the risks that are presented by processing, in particular from accidental or unlawful destruction, 
726 loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to personal data transmitted, stored or 
727 otherwise processed. 

36 of 81 728  (c) Adherence to an approved code of conduct as referred to in section 34 or an approved 
729 certification mechanism as referred to in section 36 may be used as an element by which to 
730 demonstrate compliance with the subsection (a). 
731  (d) The controller and processor shall take steps to ensure that any natural person acting 
732 under the authority of the controller or the processor who has access to personal data does not 
733 process the personal data except on instructions from the controller, unless the person is required 
734 to do so by state or federal law. 
735  Section 27. (a) In the case of a personal data breach, the controller shall without undue 
736 delay and, where feasible, not later than 72 hours after having become aware of it, notify the 
737 personal data breach to the attorney general, unless the personal data breach is unlikely to result 
738 in a risk to the rights and freedoms of natural persons. Where the notification to the attorney 
739 general is not made within 72 hours, the notification shall be accompanied by reasons for the 
740 delay. 
741  (b) The processor shall notify the controller without undue delay after becoming aware of 
742 a personal data breach. 
743  (c) The notification referred to in subsection (a) shall, at a minimum: 
744  (i) describe the nature of the personal data breach including where possible, the 
745 categories and approximate number of data subjects concerned and the categories and 
746 approximate number of personal data records concerned; 
747  (ii) communicate the name and contact details of the data protection officer or other 
748 contact point where more information can be obtained; 

37 of 81 749  (iii) describe the likely consequences of the personal data breach; and 
750  (iv) describe the measures taken or proposed to be taken by the controller to address the 
751 personal data breach, including, where appropriate, measures to mitigate its possible adverse 
752 effects. 
753  (d) Where, and in so far as, it is not possible to provide the information at the same time, 
754 the information may be provided in phases without undue further delay.  
755  (e) The controller shall document any personal data breaches, comprising the facts 
756 relating to the personal data breach, its effects and the remedial action taken. That documentation 
757 shall enable the attorney general to verify compliance with this section. 
758  Section 28. (a) When the personal data breach is likely to result in a high risk to the rights 
759 and freedoms of natural persons, the controller shall communicate the personal data breach to the 
760 data subject without undue delay. The communication shall describe in clear and plain language 
761 the nature of the personal data breach and contain at least the information and measures referred 
762 to in clauses (ii) to (iv), inclusive, of subsection (c) of section 27. 
763  (b) The communication described in subsection (a) shall not be required if: 
764  (i) the controller has implemented appropriate technical and organizational protection 
765 measures, and those measures were applied to the personal data affected by the personal data 
766 breach, in particular those measures that render the personal data unintelligible to any person 
767 who is not authorized to access it, such as encryption; 

38 of 81 768  (ii) the controller has taken subsequent measures that ensure that the high risk to the 
769 rights and freedoms of data subjects referred to in subsection (a) is no longer likely to 
770 materialize; or 
771  (iii) the communication would involve disproportionate effort; provided, that there shall 
772 instead be a public communication or similar measure whereby the data subjects are informed in 
773 an equally effective manner. 
774  (c) If the controller has not already communicated the personal data breach to the data 
775 subject, the attorney general, having considered the likelihood of the personal data breach 
776 resulting in a high risk, may require the controller to communicate the breach or may decide that 
777 any of the conditions referred to in subsection (b) are met. 
778  Section 29. (a) Where a type of processing in particular using new technologies, and 
779 taking into account the nature, scope, context and purposes of the processing, is likely to result in 
780 a high risk to the rights and freedoms of natural persons, the controller shall, prior to the 
781 processing, carry out an assessment of the impact of the envisaged processing operations on the 
782 protection of personal data. A single assessment may address a set of similar processing 
783 operations that present similar high risks. 
784  (b) The controller shall seek the advice of the data protection officer, where designated, 
785 when carrying out a data protection impact assessment described in subsection (a). 
786  (c) A data protection impact assessment described in subsection (a)shall in particular be 
787 required in the case of: 

39 of 81 788  (i) a systematic and extensive evaluation of personal aspects relating to natural persons 
789 which is based on automated processing, including profiling, and on which decisions are based 
790 that produce legal effects concerning the natural person or similarly significantly affect the 
791 natural person; 
792  (ii) processing on a large scale of special categories of data referred to in subsection (a) of 
793 section 6 or of personal data relating to criminal convictions and offences referred to in 
794 subsection (d) of said section 6; or 
795  (iii) a systematic monitoring of a publicly accessible area on a large scale. 
796  (d) The attorney general shall establish and make public a list of the kind of processing 
797 operations which are subject to the requirement for a data protection impact assessment pursuant 
798 to subsection (a).  
799  (e) The attorney general may establish and make public a list of the kind of processing 
800 operations for which no data protection impact assessment is required. 
801  (f) The assessment shall contain, at a minimum: 
802  (i) a systematic description of the envisaged processing operations and the purposes of 
803 the processing, including, where applicable, the legitimate interest pursued by the controller; 
804  (ii) an assessment of the necessity and proportionality of the processing operations in 
805 relation to the purposes; 
806  (iii) an assessment of the risks to the rights and freedoms of data subjects referred to in 
807 subsection (a); and 

40 of 81 808  (iv) the measures envisaged to address the risks, including safeguards, security measures 
809 and mechanisms to ensure the protection of personal data and to demonstrate compliance with 
810 this chapter taking into account the rights and legitimate interests of data subjects and other 
811 persons concerned. 
812  (g) Compliance with approved codes of conduct referred to in section 34 by the relevant 
813 controllers or processors shall be taken into due account in assessing the impact of the processing 
814 operations performed by the controllers or processors, in particular for the purposes of a data 
815 protection impact assessment. 
816  (h) Where appropriate, the controller shall seek the views of data subjects or 
817 representatives of data subjects on the intended processing, without prejudice to the protection of 
818 commercial or public interests or the security of processing operations. 
819  (i) Where processing pursuant to clauses (iii) or (v) of subsection (a) of section 4: (1) has 
820 a legal basis in state or federal law to which the controller is subject; (2) that law regulates the 
821 specific processing operation or set of operations in question; and (3) a data protection impact 
822 assessment has already been carried out as part of a general impact assessment in the context of 
823 the adoption of that legal basis, subsections (a) to (g), inclusive shall not apply unless the 
824 attorney generals deems it to be necessary to carry out such an assessment prior to processing 
825 activities. 
826  (j) Where necessary, the controller shall carry out a review to assess if processing is 
827 performed in accordance with the data protection impact assessment at least when there is a 
828 change of the risk represented by processing operations. 

41 of 81 829  Section 30. (a) The controller shall consult the attorney general prior to processing where 
830 a data protection impact assessment pursuant to section 29 indicates that the processing would 
831 result in a high risk in the absence of measures taken by the controller to mitigate the risk. 
832  (b) Where the attorney general is of the opinion that the intended processing referred to in 
833 subsection (a) would infringe this chapter, in particular where the controller has insufficiently 
834 identified or mitigated the risk, the attorney general shall, within period of up to 8 weeks of 
835 receipt of the request for consultation, provide written advice to the controller and, where 
836 applicable to the processor, and may use any of the powers referred to in section 46; provided, 
837 that the period may be extended by 6 weeks, taking into account the complexity of the intended 
838 processing. The attorney general shall inform the controller and, where applicable, the processor, 
839 of any extension within 1 month of receipt of the request for consultation together with the 
840 reasons for the delay. The periods may be suspended until the attorney general obtains 
841 information  requested for the purposes of the consultation. 
842  (c) When consulting the attorney general pursuant to subsection (a), the controller shall 
843 provide the attorney general with: 
844  (i) where applicable, the respective responsibilities of the controller, joint controllers and 
845 processors involved in the processing, in particular for processing within a group of 
846 undertakings; 
847  (ii) the purposes and means of the intended processing; 
848  (iii) the measures and safeguards provided to protect the rights and freedoms of data 
849 subjects pursuant to this chapter; 

42 of 81 850  (iv) where applicable, the contact details of the data protection officer; 
851  (v) the data protection impact assessment provided for in section 29; and 
852  (vi) any other information requested by the attorney general. 
853  Notwithstanding subsection (a), general or special law may require controllers to consult 
854 with, and obtain prior authorization from, the attorney general in relation to processing by a 
855 controller for the performance of a task carried out by the controller in the public interest, 
856 including processing in relation to social protection and public health. 
857  Section 31. (a) The controller and the processor shall designate a data protection officer 
858 in any case where: 
859  (i) the processing is carried out by a public authority or body, except for courts acting in 
860 their judicial capacity; 
861  (ii) the core activities of the controller or the processor consist of processing operations 
862 which, by virtue of their nature, their scope or their purposes, require regular and systematic 
863 monitoring of data subjects on a large scale; or 
864  (iii) the core activities of the controller or the processor consist of processing on a large 
865 scale of special categories of data pursuant to subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 6 or 
866 personal data relating to criminal convictions and offences referred to in subsection (d) of said 
867 section 6. 
868  (b) A group of undertakings may appoint a single data protection officer; provided, that a 
869 data protection officer is easily accessible from each establishment. 

43 of 81 870  (c) Where the controller or the processor is a public authority or body, a single data 
871 protection officer may be designated for several authorities or bodies, taking account of 
872 organizational structure and size. 
873  (d) In cases other than those referred to in subsection (a), the controller or processor or 
874 associations and other bodies representing categories of controllers or processors may or, where 
875 required by state or federal law shall, designate a data protection officer. The data protection 
876 officer may act for the associations and other bodies representing controllers or processors. 
877  (e) The data protection officer shall be designated on the basis of professional qualities 
878 and, in particular, expert knowledge of data protection law and practices and the ability to fulfil 
879 the tasks referred to in section 33. The data protection officer may be a staff member of the 
880 controller or processor, or fulfill the tasks on the basis of a service contract. The controller or the 
881 processor shall publish the contact details of the data protection officer and communicate the 
882 details to the attorney general. 
883  Section 32. (a) The controller and the processor shall ensure that the data protection 
884 officer is involved, properly and in a timely manner, in all issues which relate to the protection of 
885 personal data. The controller and processor shall support the data protection officer in 
886 performing the tasks referred to in section 33 by providing resources necessary to carry out the 
887 tasks and access to personal data and processing operations, and to maintain the data protection 
888 officer’s expert knowledge. 
889  (b) The controller and processor shall ensure that the data protection officer does not 
890 receive any instructions regarding the exercise of the tasks referred to in section 33. The data 
891 protection officer shall not be dismissed or penalized by the controller or the processor for 

44 of 81 892 performing the tasks. The data protection officer shall directly report to the highest management 
893 level of the controller or the processor. 
894  (c) Data subjects may contact the data protection officer with regard to all issues related 
895 to processing of personal data and to the exercise of data subjects’ rights under this Regulation. 
896  (d) The data protection officer shall be bound by secrecy or confidentiality concerning 
897 the performance of their tasks, in accordance with state or federal law. 
898  (e) The data protection officer may fulfill other tasks and duties; provided, that the 
899 controller or processor shall ensure that the tasks and duties do not result in a conflict of 
900 interests. 
901  Section 33. The data protection officer shall: 
902  (i) inform and advise the controller or the processor and the employees who carry out 
903 processing of controller or processor obligations pursuant to this chapter and  other general or 
904 special laws regarding data protection; 
905  (ii) monitor compliance with this chapter, with other general or special laws regarding 
906 data protection and with the policies of the controller or processor in relation to the protection of 
907 personal data, including the assignment of responsibilities, awareness-raising and training of 
908 staff involved in processing operations, and the related audits; 
909  (iii) provide advice where requested as regards the data protection impact assessment and 
910 monitor its performance pursuant to section 29; 
911  (iv) cooperate with the attorney general; and 

45 of 81 912  (v) act as the contact point for the attorney genera; on issues relating to processing, 
913 including the prior consultation referred to in section 30, and consult, where appropriate, with 
914 regard to any other matter. 
915  The data protection officer shall in the performance of these tasks have due regard to the 
916 risk associated with processing operations, taking into account the nature, scope, context and 
917 purposes of processing. 
918  Section 34. (a) The attorney general shall encourage the drawing up of codes of conduct 
919 intended to contribute to the proper application of this chapter, taking account of the specific 
920 features of the various processing sectors and the specific needs of micro, small and medium-
921 sized enterprises. 
922  (b) Associations and other bodies representing categories of controllers or processors 
923 may prepare codes of conduct, or amend or extend such codes, for the purpose of specifying the 
924 application of this chapter, such as with regard to: 
925  (i) fair and transparent processing; 
926  (ii) the legitimate interests pursued by controllers in specific contexts; 
927  (iii) the collection of personal data; 
928  (iv) the pseudonymization of personal data; 
929  (v) the information provided to the public and to data subjects; 
930  (vi) the exercise of the rights of data subjects; 

46 of 81 931  (vii) the information provided to, and the protection of, children, and the manner in which 
932 the consent of the holders of parental responsibility over children is to be obtained; 
933  (viii) the measures and procedures referred to in sections 18 and 19 and the measures to 
934 ensure security of processing referred to in section 26; 
935  (ix) the notification of personal data breaches to supervisory authorities and the 
936 communication of the personal data breaches to data subjects; 
937  (x) the transfer of personal data to foreign destinations; or 
938  (xi) out-of-court proceedings and other dispute resolution procedures for resolving 
939 disputes between controllers and data subjects with regard to processing, without prejudice to the 
940 rights of data subjects pursuant to sections 51 and 53. 
941  (c) In addition to adherence by controllers or processors subject to this chapter, codes of 
942 conduct approved pursuant to subsection (e) and having general validity pursuant to subsection 
943 (i) may also be adhered to by controllers or processors that are not subject to this chapter 
944 pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of section 2 in order to provide appropriate safeguards within 
945 the framework of personal data transfers to foreign destinations pursuant to clause (iv) of 
946 subsection (b) of section 40. Said controllers or processors shall make binding and enforceable 
947 commitments, via contractual or other legally binding instruments, to apply those appropriate 
948 safeguards including with regard to the rights of data subjects. 
949  (d) A code of conduct referred to in subsection (b) shall contain mechanisms which 
950 enable the body referred to in subsection (a) of section 35 to carry out the mandatory monitoring 

47 of 81 951 of compliance with its provisions by the controllers or processors which undertake to apply it, 
952 without prejudice to the tasks and powers of the attorney general. 
953  (e) Associations and other bodies referred to in subsection (b) which intend to prepare a 
954 code of conduct or to amend or extend an existing code shall submit the draft code, amendment 
955 or extension to the attorney general. The attorney general shall provide an opinion on whether 
956 the draft code, amendment or extension complies with this chapter and shall approve the draft 
957 code, amendment or extension if the draft, amendment or extension provides sufficient 
958 appropriate safeguards.  
959  (f) The attorney general shall collate all approved codes of conduct, amendments and 
960 extensions in a register and shall make them publicly available by way of appropriate means. 
961  Section 35. (a) Without prejudice to the tasks and powers of the attorney general pursuant 
962 to subsection (b) of section 45 and subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 46, the monitoring 
963 of compliance with a code of conduct pursuant to section 34 may be carried out by a body which 
964 has an appropriate level of expertise in relation to the subject-matter of the code and is accredited 
965 for that purpose by the attorney general. 
966  (b) A body may be accredited to monitor compliance with a code of conduct where that 
967 body has: 
968  (i) demonstrated independence and expertise in relation to the subject-matter of the code 
969 to the satisfaction of the attorney general; 

48 of 81 970  (ii) established procedures which allow the body to assess the eligibility of controllers 
971 and processors concerned to apply the code, to monitor compliance with code provisions and to 
972 periodically review code operation; 
973  (iii) established procedures and structures to handle complaints about infringements of 
974 the code or the manner in which the code has been, or is being, implemented by a controller or 
975 processor, and to make those procedures and structures transparent to data subjects and the 
976 public; and 
977  (iv) demonstrated to the satisfaction of the attorney general that the body’s tasks and 
978 duties do not result in a conflict of interests. 
979  (c) Without prejudice to the tasks and powers of the attorney general or the provisions of 
980 sections 77 to 84, inclusive, a body shall, subject to appropriate safeguards, take appropriate 
981 action in cases of infringement of the code by a controller or processor, including suspension or 
982 exclusion of the controller or processor concerned from the code. The body shall inform the 
983 attorney general of the actions and the reasons for taking the actions. 
984  (d) The attorney general shall revoke the accreditation of a body if the requirements for 
985 accreditation are not, or are no longer, met or where actions taken by the body infringe this 
986 chapter. 
987  (e) This section shall not apply to processing carried out by public authorities and bodies. 
988  Section 36. (a) The attorney general shall encourage the establishment of data protection 
989 certification mechanisms and of data protection seals and marks, for the purpose of 
990 demonstrating compliance with this chapter of processing operations by controllers and 

49 of 81 991 processors. The specific needs of micro, small and medium-sized enterprises shall be taken into 
992 account. 
993  (b) In addition to adherence by controllers or processors subject to this chapter, data 
994 protection certification mechanisms, seals or marks approved pursuant to subsection (e) may be 
995 established for the purpose of demonstrating the existence of appropriate safeguards provided by 
996 controllers or processors that are not subject to this chapter pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of 
997 section 2 within the framework of personal data transfers to foreign destinations pursuant to 
998 clause (v) of subsection (b) of section 40. Said controllers or processors shall make binding and 
999 enforceable commitments, via contractual or other legally binding instruments, to apply those 
1000 appropriate safeguards, including with regard to the rights of data subjects. 
1001  (c) The certification shall be voluntary and available via a process that is transparent. 
1002  (d) A certification pursuant to this section does not reduce the responsibility of the 
1003 controller or the processor for compliance with this chapter and is without prejudice to the tasks 
1004 and powers of the  attorney general pursuant to sections 45 and 46. 
1005  (e) A certification shall be issued by the certification bodies referred to in section 37 or 
1006 by the attorney general, on the basis of criteria approved by the attorney general pursuant to 
1007 section 46. Where the criteria are approved by the attorney general, this may result in a common 
1008 certification, the Commonwealth Data Protection Seal. 
1009  (f) The controller or processor which submits its processing to the certification 
1010 mechanism shall provide the certification body referred to in section 37, or where applicable, the 
1011 attorney general, with all information and access to the controller or processor’s processing 
1012 activities that is necessary to conduct the certification procedure. 

50 of 81 1013  (g) Certification shall be issued to a controller or processor for a maximum period of 3 
1014 years and may be renewed under the same conditions; provided, that the relevant criteria 
1015 continue to be met. Certification shall be withdrawn, as applicable, by the certification bodies 
1016 referred to in section 37 or by the attorney general where the criteria for the certification are not 
1017 or are no longer met. 
1018  (h) The attorney general shall collate all certification mechanisms and data protection 
1019 seals and marks in a register and shall make them publicly available by any appropriate means. 
1020  Section 37. (a) Without prejudice to the tasks and powers of the attorney general pursuant 
1021 to subsection (b) of section 45 and subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 46, certification 
1022 bodies which have an appropriate level of expertise in relation to data protection shall, after 
1023 informing the attorney general in order to allow the attorney general to exercise their powers 
1024 pursuant to clause (xiv) of subsection (a) of section 46 where necessary, issue and renew 
1025 certification. The attorney general shall accredit the certification bodies. 
1026  (b) A certification body shall be accredited by the attorney general only if the body has: 
1027  (i) demonstrated independence and expertise in relation to the subject-matter of the 
1028 certification to the satisfaction of the attorney general; 
1029  (ii) undertaken to respect the criteria described in subsection (e) of section 36; 
1030  (iii) established procedures for the issuing, periodic review and withdrawal of data 
1031 protection certification, seals and marks;  
1032  (iv) established procedures and structures to handle complaints about infringements of 
1033 the certification or the manner in which the certification has been, or is being, implemented by 

51 of 81 1034 the controller or processor, and to make those procedures and structures transparent to data 
1035 subjects and the public; and  
1036  (v) demonstrated, to the satisfaction of the attorney general, that the body’s tasks and 
1037 duties do not result in a conflict of interests. 
1038  (c) The accreditation of certification bodies pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) shall take 
1039 place on the basis of requirements approved by the attorney general .  
1040  (d) The certification bodies shall be responsible for the proper assessment leading to the 
1041 certification or the withdrawal of the certification without prejudice to the responsibility of the 
1042 controller or processor for compliance with this chapter. The accreditation shall be issued for a 
1043 maximum period of 5 years and may be renewed on the same conditions; provided, that the 
1044 certification body meets the requirements set out in this section. The certification bodies shall 
1045 provide the attorney general with the reasons for granting or withdrawing the requested 
1046 certification. 
1047  (e) The requirements referred to in subsection (c) and the criteria referred to in subsection 
1048 (e) of section 36 shall be made public by the attorney general in an easily accessible form.  
1049  (f) Without prejudice to sections 77 to 84, inclusive, the attorney general shall revoke an 
1050 accreditation of a certification body pursuant to subsection (a) where the conditions for the 
1051 accreditation are not, or are no longer, met or where actions taken by a certification body infringe 
1052 this chapter. 
1053  (g) The attorney general may promulgate rules and regulations: (i) specifying the 
1054 requirements to be taken into account for the data protection certification mechanisms described 

52 of 81 1055 in subsection (a) of section 35; and (ii) laying down technical standards for certification 
1056 mechanisms and data protection seals and marks, and mechanisms to promote and recognize 
1057 those certification mechanisms, seals and marks.  
1058  Section 38. Any transfer of personal data that is undergoing processing or is intended for 
1059 processing after transfer to a foreign destination shall take place only if, subject to the other 
1060 provisions of this chapter, the conditions laid down in this section and sections 39 to 44, 
1061 inclusive, are complied with by the controller and processor, including for onward transfers of 
1062 personal data from a foreign destination to another foreign destination. All provisions in this 
1063 section and sections 39 to 44, inclusive, shall be applied in order to ensure that the level of 
1064 protection of natural persons guaranteed by this chapter is not undermined. 
1065  Section 39. (a) A transfer of personal data to a foreign destination may take place where 
1066 the attorney general has decided that the foreign destination in question ensures an adequate level 
1067 of protection. The transfer shall not require any specific authorization. 
1068  (b) When assessing the adequacy of the level of protection, the attorney general shall, in 
1069 particular, take account of the following elements: 
1070  (i) the rule of law, respect for human rights and fundamental freedoms, relevant 
1071 legislation, both general and special, including concerning public security, defense, national 
1072 security and criminal law and the access of public authorities to personal data, as well as the 
1073 implementation of the legislation, data protection rules, professional rules and security measures, 
1074 including rules for the onward transfer of personal data to another foreign destination that are 
1075 complied with in that foreign destination, case-law, as well as effective and enforceable data 

53 of 81 1076 subject rights and effective administrative and judicial redress for the data subjects whose 
1077 personal data are being transferred; 
1078  (ii) the existence and effective functioning of 1 or more independent supervisory 
1079 authorities in the state or country or to which an international organization is subject, with 
1080 responsibility for ensuring and enforcing compliance with the data protection rules, including 
1081 adequate enforcement powers, for assisting and advising the data subjects in exercising data 
1082 subjects’ rights and for cooperation with the supervisory authorities and the attorney general; and 
1083  (iii) the international commitments the country or international organization concerned 
1084 has entered into, or other obligations arising from legally binding conventions or instruments as 
1085 well as from the country or organization’s participation in multilateral or regional systems, in 
1086 particular in relation to the protection of personal data. 
1087  (c) The attorney general, after assessing the adequacy of the level of protection, may 
1088 decide, by regulation, that a foreign destination ensures an adequate level of protection within the 
1089 meaning of subsection (b). The regulation shall provide for a mechanism for a periodic review, at 
1090 least every 4 years, which shall take into account all relevant developments in the foreign 
1091 destination. The regulation shall specify the scope and application and, where applicable, 
1092 identify the supervisory authority or authorities referred to in clause (ii) of subsection (b).  
1093  (d) The attorney general shall, on an ongoing basis, monitor developments in foreign 
1094 destinations that could affect the functioning of decisions adopted pursuant to subsection (c). 
1095  (e) The attorney general shall, where available information reveals, in particular 
1096 following the review referred to in subsection (c), that a foreign destination no longer ensures an 
1097 adequate level of protection within the meaning of subsection (b), to the extent necessary, repeal, 

54 of 81 1098 amend or suspend the decision referred to in subsection (c) by means of regulation without 
1099 retroactive effect. On duly justified imperative grounds of urgency, the attorney general shall 
1100 adopt immediately applicable  regulations. 
1101  (f) The attorney general shall enter into consultations with a foreign destination with a 
1102 view to remedying the situation giving rise to the decision described in subsection (e). 
1103  (g) A decision described in subsection (e) is without prejudice to transfers of personal 
1104 data to the foreign destination in question pursuant to sections 40 to 43, inclusive. 
1105  (h) The attorney general shall publish a list of the states, countries, territories and  
1106 organizations for which the attorney general has decided that an adequate level of protection is or 
1107 is no longer ensured. 
1108  Section 40. (a) In the absence of a decision pursuant subsection (c) of section 39, a 
1109 controller or processor shall only transfer personal data to a foreign destination if the controller 
1110 or processor has provided appropriate safeguards, and on condition that enforceable data subject 
1111 rights and effective legal remedies for data subjects are available. 
1112  (b) The appropriate safeguards  may be provided for, without requiring any specific 
1113 authorization from the attorney general, by: 
1114  (i) a legally binding and enforceable instrument between public authorities or bodies; 
1115  (ii) binding corporate rules in accordance with section 41; 
1116  (iii) standard data protection clauses adopted by the attorney general; 

55 of 81 1117  (iv) an approved code of conduct pursuant to section 34 together with binding and 
1118 enforceable commitments of the controller or processor in the foreign destination to apply the 
1119 appropriate safeguards, including as regards data subjects' rights; or 
1120  (v) an approved certification mechanism pursuant to section 36 together with binding and 
1121 enforceable commitments of the controller or processor in the foreign destination to apply the 
1122 appropriate safeguards, including as regards data subjects' rights. 
1123  (c) Subject to the authorization from the attorney general, the appropriate safeguards may 
1124 also be provided for, in particular, by: 
1125  (i) contractual clauses between the controller or processor and the controller, processor or 
1126 the recipient of the personal data in the foreign destination; or 
1127  (ii) provisions to be inserted into administrative arrangements between public authorities 
1128 or bodies that include enforceable and effective data subject rights. 
1129  Section 41. (a) The attorney general shall approve binding corporate rules, provided that 
1130 the rules: (i) are legally binding and apply to and are enforced by every member concerned of the 
1131 group of undertakings, or group of enterprises engaged in a joint economic activity, including 
1132 employees; (ii) expressly confer enforceable rights on data subjects with regard to the processing 
1133 of the data subjects’ personal data; and (iii) fulfill the requirements of subsection (b). 
1134  (b) The binding corporate rules described in subsection (a) shall specify:  
1135  (i) the structure and contact details of the group of undertakings, or group of enterprises 
1136 engaged in a joint economic activity and of each of the group’s members;  

56 of 81 1137  (ii) the data transfers or set of transfers, including the categories of personal data, the type 
1138 of processing and purposes of the processing, the type of data subjects affected and the 
1139 identification of the foreign destination in question;  
1140  (iii) the legally binding nature of the rules, both internally and externally;  
1141  (iv) the application of the general data protection principles, in particular purpose 
1142 limitation, data minimization, limited storage periods, data quality, data protection by design and 
1143 by default, legal basis for processing, processing of special categories of personal data, measures 
1144 to ensure data security, and the requirements in respect of onward transfers to bodies not bound 
1145 by the binding corporate rules;  
1146  (v) the rights of data subjects in regard to processing and the means to exercise those 
1147 rights, including the right not to be subject to decisions based solely on automated processing, 
1148 including profiling in accordance with section 17, the right to lodge a complaint with the attorney 
1149 general in accordance with section 53, and to obtain redress and, where appropriate, 
1150 compensation for a breach of the binding corporate rules;  
1151  (vi) how the information on the binding corporate rules, in particular on clauses (iv) and 
1152 (v), is provided to the data subjects in addition to the information required in sections 8 and 9;  
1153  (vii) the tasks of any data protection officer designated in accordance with section 31 or 
1154 any other person or entity in charge of the monitoring compliance with the binding corporate 
1155 rules within the group of undertakings, or group of enterprises engaged in a joint economic 
1156 activity, as well as monitoring training and complaint-handling;  
1157  (viii) the complaint procedures;  

57 of 81 1158  (ix) the mechanisms within the group of undertakings, or group of enterprises engaged in 
1159 a joint economic activity for ensuring the verification of compliance with the binding corporate 
1160 rules; provided, that the mechanisms shall include data protection audits and methods for 
1161 ensuring corrective actions to protect the rights of the data subject; and, provided further, that 
1162 results of the verification shall be communicated to the person or entity referred to in clause (vii) 
1163 and to the board of the controlling undertaking of a group of undertakings, or of the group of 
1164 enterprises engaged in a joint economic activity, and should be available upon request to the 
1165 attorney general;  
1166  (x) the mechanisms for reporting and recording changes to the rules and reporting those 
1167 changes to the attorney general;  
1168  (xi) the cooperation mechanism with the attorney general to ensure compliance by any 
1169 member of the group of undertakings, or group of enterprises engaged in a joint economic 
1170 activity, in particular by making available to the attorney general the results of verifications of 
1171 the measures referred to in clause (ix);  
1172  (xii) the mechanisms for reporting to the  attorney general any legal requirements to 
1173 which a member of the group of undertakings, or group of enterprises engaged in a joint 
1174 economic activity is subject in a foreign destination that are likely to have a substantial adverse 
1175 effect on the guarantees provided by the binding corporate rules; and  
1176  (xiii) the appropriate data protection training to personnel having permanent or regular 
1177 access to personal data. 

58 of 81 1178  (c) The attorney general may specify by regulation the format and procedures for the 
1179 exchange of information between controllers, processors and the attorney general for binding 
1180 corporate rules within the meaning of this section.  
1181  Section 42. Any judgment of a court or tribunal and any decision of an administrative 
1182 authority of a foreign destination requiring a controller or processor to transfer or disclose 
1183 personal data may only be recognized or enforceable in any manner if based on an international 
1184 agreement, such as a mutual legal assistance treaty, in force between the requesting foreign 
1185 destination and the United States or the commonwealth, without prejudice to other grounds for 
1186 transfer pursuant to this chapter. 
1187  Section 43. (a) In the absence of an adequacy decision pursuant to subsection (c) of 
1188 section 39, or of appropriate safeguards pursuant to section 40, including binding corporate rules, 
1189 a transfer or a set of transfers of personal data to a foreign destination shall take place only if: 
1190  (i) the data subject explicitly consented to the proposed transfer, after having been 
1191 informed of the possible risks of the transfers for the data subject due to the absence of an 
1192 adequacy decision and appropriate safeguards; 
1193  (ii) the transfer is necessary for the performance of a contract between the data subject 
1194 and the controller or the implementation of pre-contractual measures taken at the data subject's 
1195 request; 
1196  (iii) the transfer is necessary for the conclusion or performance of a contract concluded in 
1197 the interest of the data subject between the controller and another natural or legal person; 
1198  (iv) the transfer is necessary for important reasons of public interest; 

59 of 81 1199  (v) the transfer is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims; 
1200  (vi) the transfer is necessary in order to protect the vital interests of the data subject or of 
1201 other persons, where the data subject is physically or legally incapable of giving consent; or 
1202  (vii) the transfer is made from a register which, according to state or federal law, is 
1203 intended to provide information to the public and which is open to consultation either by the 
1204 public in general or by any person who can demonstrate a legitimate interest, but only to the 
1205 extent that the conditions laid down by state or federal law for consultation are fulfilled in the 
1206 particular case. 
1207  (b) Where a transfer could not be based on a provision of section 39 or 40, including the 
1208 provisions on binding corporate rules, and none of the derogations for a specific situation 
1209 referred to in subsection (a) apply, a transfer to a foreign destination may take place only if the 
1210 transfer is not repetitive, concerns only a limited number of data subjects, is necessary for the 
1211 purposes of compelling legitimate interests pursued by the controller which are not overridden 
1212 by the interests or rights and freedoms of the data subject, and the controller has assessed all the 
1213 circumstances surrounding the data transfer and has on the basis of that assessment provided 
1214 suitable safeguards with regard to the protection of personal data. The controller shall inform the 
1215 attorney general of the transfer. The controller shall, in addition to providing the information 
1216 referred to in sections 8 and 9, inform the data subject of the transfer and of the compelling 
1217 legitimate interests pursued. 
1218  (c) A transfer pursuant to subsection (b) shall not involve the entirety of the personal data 
1219 or entire categories of the personal data contained in the register. Where the register is intended 

60 of 81 1220 for consultation by persons having a legitimate interest, the transfer shall be made only at the 
1221 request of those persons or if those persons are to be the recipients. 
1222  (d) Clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subsection (a) and subsection (b) shall not apply to 
1223 activities carried out by public authorities in the exercise of their public powers. 
1224  (e) The public interest referred to in clause (iv) of subsection (a) shall be recognized in 
1225 federal law or in the law of the state to which the controller is subject. 
1226  (f) In the absence of an adequacy decision, general or special law may, for important 
1227 reasons of public interest, expressly set limits to the transfer of specific categories of personal 
1228 data to a foreign destination. 
1229  (g) The controller or processor shall document the assessment as well as the suitable 
1230 safeguards referred to in subsection (b) in the records referred to in section 24. 
1231  Section 44. In relation to foreign destinations, the attorney general shall take appropriate 
1232 steps to: 
1233  (i) develop cooperation mechanisms to facilitate the effective enforcement of legislation 
1234 for the protection of personal data; 
1235  (ii) provide mutual assistance in the enforcement of legislation for the protection of 
1236 personal data, including through notification, complaint referral, investigative assistance and 
1237 information exchange, subject to appropriate safeguards for the protection of personal data and 
1238 other fundamental rights and freedoms; 
1239  (iii) engage relevant stakeholders in discussion and activities aimed at furthering 
1240 cooperation in the enforcement of legislation for the protection of personal data; and 

61 of 81 1241  (iv) promote the exchange and documentation of personal data protection legislation and 
1242 practice, including on jurisdictional conflicts with other foreign destinations. 
1243  Section 45.  (a) The attorney shall be responsible for monitoring the application of this 
1244 chapter, in order to protect the fundamental rights and freedoms of natural persons in relation to 
1245 processing and to facilitate the free flow of personal data within the commonwealth. 
1246  (b) The attorney general shall: 
1247  (i) monitor and enforce the application of this chapter; 
1248  (ii) promote public awareness and understanding of the risks, rules, safeguards and rights 
1249 in relation to processing, including, but not limited to, activities addressed specifically to 
1250 children that shall receive specific attention; 
1251  (iii) advise, in accordance with general and special law, the general court, municipalities, 
1252 state agencies and other institutions and bodies on legislative and administrative measures 
1253 relating to the protection of natural persons' rights and freedoms with regard to processing; 
1254  (iv) promote the awareness of controllers and processors of their obligations pursuant to 
1255 this chapter; 
1256  (v) upon request, provide information to any data subject concerning the exercise of their 
1257 rights pursuant to this chapter and, if appropriate, cooperate with the supervisory authorities in 
1258 foreign destinations to that end; 
1259  (vi) handle complaints lodged by a data subject, or by a body, organization or association 
1260 in accordance with section 54, and investigate, to the extent appropriate, the subject matter of the 
1261 complaint and inform the complainant of the progress and the outcome of the investigation 

62 of 81 1262 within a reasonable period, in particular if further investigation or coordination with a 
1263 supervisory authority in a foreign destination is necessary; 
1264  (vii) cooperate with, including sharing information and providing mutual assistance to, 
1265 supervisory authorities in foreign destinations; 
1266  (viii) conduct investigations on the application of this chapter, including on the basis of 
1267 information received from a supervisory authority in a foreign destination or other public 
1268 authority; 
1269  (ix) monitor relevant developments, insofar as they have an impact on the protection of 
1270 personal data, in particular the development of information and communication technologies and 
1271 commercial practices; 
1272  (x) adopt standard contractual clauses referred to in subsection (g) of section 22 and 
1273 clause (iii) of subsection (b) of section 40; 
1274  (xi) establish and maintain a list in relation to the requirement for data protection impact 
1275 assessment pursuant to subsection (d) of section 29; 
1276  (xii) give advice on the processing operations referred to in subsection (b) of section 30; 
1277  (xiii) encourage the drawing up of codes of conduct pursuant to subsection (a) of section 
1278 34 and provide an opinion and approve such codes of conduct which provide sufficient 
1279 safeguards,   pursuant to subsection (e) of said section 34; 
1280  (xiv) encourage the establishment of data protection certification mechanisms and of data 
1281 protection seals and marks pursuant to subsection (a) of section 36, and approve the criteria of 
1282 certification pursuant to subsection (e) of said section 36; 

63 of 81 1283  (xv) where applicable, carry out a periodic review of certifications issued in accordance 
1284 with subsection (g) of section 36; 
1285  (xvi) draft and publish the requirements for accreditation of a body for monitoring codes 
1286 of conduct pursuant to section 35 and of a certification body pursuant to section 37; 
1287  (xvii) conduct the accreditation of a body for monitoring codes of conduct pursuant to 
1288 section 35 and of a certification body pursuant to section 37; 
1289  (xviii) authorize contractual clauses and provisions referred to in subsection (c) of section 
1290 40; 
1291  (xix) approve binding corporate rules pursuant to section 41; 
1292  (xx) keep internal records of infringements of this chapter and of measures taken in 
1293 accordance with clause (ii) of subsection (a) of section 46; and 
1294  (xxi) fulfill any other tasks related to the protection of personal data.  
1295  (c) The attorney general shall facilitate the submission of complaints referred to in clause 
1296 (vi) of subsection (b) by measures such as a complaint submission form which can also be 
1297 completed electronically, without excluding other means of communication. 
1298  (d) The performance of the tasks described in subsection (b) shall be free of charge for 
1299 the data subject and, where applicable, for the data protection officer; provided, however, that 
1300 where requests are manifestly unfounded or excessive, in particular because of their repetitive 
1301 character, the attorney general may charge a reasonable fee based on administrative costs, or 
1302 refuse to act on the request; and, provided further, that the attorney general shall bear the burden 
1303 of demonstrating the manifestly unfounded or excessive character of the request. 

64 of 81 1304  Section 46. (a) The attorney general shall have the power to: 
1305  (i) order the controller and the processor, and, where applicable, the controller's or the 
1306 processor's representative to provide any information the attorney general requires for the 
1307 performance of the attorney general’s duties pursuant to this chapter; 
1308  (ii) carry out investigations in the form of data protection audits; 
1309  (iii) carry out a review on certifications issued pursuant to subsection (g) of section 36; 
1310  (iv) notify the controller or the processor of an alleged infringement of this chapter; 
1311  (v) obtain, from the controller and the processor, access to all personal data and to all 
1312 information necessary for the performance of the attorney general’s duties pursuant to this 
1313 chapter; 
1314  (vi) obtain access to any premises of the controller and the processor, including to any 
1315 data processing equipment and means, in accordance with state or federal procedural law; 
1316  (vii) issue warnings to a controller or processor that intended processing operations are 
1317 likely to infringe on this chapter; 
1318  (viii) issue reprimands to a controller or a processor where processing operations have 
1319 infringed on this chapter; 
1320  (ix) order the controller or the processor to comply with the data subject's requests to 
1321 exercise the data subject’s rights pursuant to this chapter; 
1322  (x) order the controller or processor to bring processing operations into compliance with 
1323 this chapter, where appropriate, in a specified manner and within a specified period; 

65 of 81 1324  (xi) order the controller to communicate a personal data breach to the data subject; 
1325  (xii) impose a temporary or definitive limitation, including a ban on processing; 
1326  (xiii) order the rectification or erasure of personal data or restriction of processing 
1327 pursuant to sections 11 to 13, inclusive, and the notification to recipients to whom the personal 
1328 data has been disclosed pursuant to subsection (b) of section 12 and section 14; 
1329  (xiv) withdraw a certification or order the certification body to withdraw a certification 
1330 issued pursuant to sections 36 or 37, or order the certification body not to issue certification if the 
1331 requirements for the certification are not or are no longer met; 
1332  (xv) impose an administrative fine pursuant to section 56, in addition to, or instead of 
1333 measures referred to in this subsection, depending on the circumstances of each individual case; 
1334  (xvi) order the suspension of data flows to a recipient in a foreign destination; 
1335  (xvii) advise the controller in accordance with the prior consultation procedure referred to 
1336 section 30; 
1337  (xviii) issue, on the attorney general’s initiative or on request, opinions to the general 
1338 court, the governor or, in accordance with general and special law, to other institutions and 
1339 bodies as well as to the public on any issue related to the protection of personal data; 
1340  (xix) authorize processing referred to in subsection (c) of section 30; 
1341  (xx) issue an opinion and approve draft codes of conduct pursuant to subsection (e) of 
1342 section 34; 
1343  (xxi) accredit certification bodies pursuant to section 37; 

66 of 81 1344  (xxii) issue certifications and approve criteria of certification in accordance with 
1345 subsection (e) of section 36; 
1346  (xxiii) adopt standard data protection clauses referred to in subsection (g) of section 22 
1347 and clause (iii) of subsection (b) of section 40; 
1348  (xxiv) authorize contractual clauses referred to in clause (i) of subsection (c) of section 
1349 40; 
1350  (xxv) authorize administrative arrangements referred to in clause (ii) of subsection (c) of 
1351 section 40; and 
1352  (xxvi) approve binding corporate rules pursuant to section 41. 
1353  (b) The exercise of the powers conferred on the attorney general pursuant to this section 
1354 shall be subject to appropriate safeguards, including effective judicial remedy and due process, 
1355 set out in general and special law. 
1356  (c) The attorney general shall have the power to commence or engage otherwise in legal 
1357 proceedings in order to enforce the provisions of this chapter. 
1358  (d) Annually, the attorney general shall compile a report on activities taken pursuant to 
1359 this chapter, which may include a list of types of infringement notified and types of measures 
1360 taken in accordance with subsection (a). The reports shall be transmitted to the clerks of the 
1361 house of representatives and the senate and the joint committee on advanced information 
1362 technology, the internet and cybersecurity. The attorney general shall make the reports available 
1363 to the public on the attorney general’s website. 

67 of 81 1364  Section 47. (a) Upon adopting a decision regarding a complaint pursuant to this chapter, 
1365 the attorney general shall transmit the decision to the main establishment or single establishment 
1366 of the controller or processor, including a summary of the relevant facts and grounds.  
1367  (b) Where a complaint is dismissed or rejected, the attorney general shall notify the 
1368 complainant and the controller. 
1369  (c) Where the attorney general dismisses or rejects parts of a complaint and acts on other 
1370 parts of that complaint, a separate decision shall be adopted for each part of the complaint.  
1371  (d) After being notified of the decision, the controller or processor shall take the 
1372 necessary measures to ensure compliance with the decision as regards processing activities in the 
1373 context of all its establishments in the commonwealth. The controller or processor shall notify 
1374 the measures taken for complying with the decision to the attorney general. 
1375  (e) Where, in exceptional circumstances, the attorney general has reasons to consider that 
1376 there is an urgent need to act in order to protect the interests of data subjects, the urgency 
1377 procedure referred to in section 48 shall apply. 
1378  Section 48. (a) In exceptional circumstances, where the attorney general considers that 
1379 there is an urgent need to act in order to protect the rights and freedoms of data subjects, the 
1380 attorney general may immediately adopt provisional measures intended to produce legal effects 
1381 in the commonwealth with a specified period of validity which shall not exceed 3 months.  
1382  (b) Where the attorney general has taken a measure pursuant to subsection (a) and 
1383 considers that final measures need urgently be adopted, the attorney general may request an 

68 of 81 1384 urgent opinion or an urgent binding decision from the superior court, giving reasons for 
1385 requesting such opinion or decision. 
1386  (c) The attorney general may request an urgent opinion or an urgent binding decision, as 
1387 the case may be, from the superior court where there is an urgent need to act, in order to protect 
1388 the rights and freedoms of data subjects, giving reasons for requesting such opinion or decision, 
1389 including for the urgent need to act.(d)  The superior court shall provide n urgent opinion or an 
1390 urgent binding decision referred to in subsections (b) and (c) within 2 weeks of the request by the 
1391 attorney general. 
1392  Section 49. (a) The attorney general shall, on the attorney general’s own initiative or, 
1393 where relevant, at the request of the general court: 
1394  (i) advise the general court on any issue related to the protection of personal data in the 
1395 commonwealth, including on any proposed amendment of this chapter; 
1396  (ii) advise the general court on the format and procedures for the exchange of information 
1397 between controllers, processors and supervisory authorities for binding corporate rules; 
1398  (iii) issue guidelines, recommendations and best practices on procedures for erasing links, 
1399 copies or replications of personal data from publicly available communication services as 
1400 referred to in subsection (b) of section 22; 
1401  (iv) examine, on the attorney general’s own initiative, on request of the general court, any 
1402 question covering the application of this chapter and issue guidelines, recommendations and best 
1403 practices in order to encourage consistent application of this chapter;  

69 of 81 1404  (v) draw up guidelines concerning the application of measures referred to in section 46 
1405 and the setting of administrative fines pursuant to section 55; 
1406  (vi) encourage the drawing-up of codes of conduct and the establishment of data 
1407 protection certification mechanisms and data protection seals and marks pursuant to sections 34 
1408 and 36; 
1409  (vii) approve the criteria of certification pursuant to subsection (e) of section 36 and 
1410 maintain a public register of certification mechanisms and data protection seals and marks 
1411 pursuant to subsection (h) of said section 36 and of the certified controllers or processors 
1412 established in foreign destinations pursuant to subsection (g) of said section 36.; 
1413  (viii) approve the requirements referred to in subsection (c) of section 37 with a view to 
1414 the accreditation of certification bodies referred to in said section 37; 
1415  (ix) promote the exchange of knowledge and documentation on data protection 
1416 legislation and practice with data protection supervisory authorities worldwide; and 
1417  (x) maintain a publicly accessible electronic register of decisions taken by supervisory 
1418 authorities and courts on issues handled in the consistency mechanism. 
1419  (b) The guidelines, recommendations and best practices described in clause (iv) of 
1420 subsection (a) shall include, but not be limited to, guidelines, recommendations and best 
1421 practices:  
1422  (i) for further specifying the criteria and conditions for decisions based on profiling 
1423 pursuant to subsection (b) of section 17;  

70 of 81 1424  (ii) for establishing the personal data breaches and determining the undue delay referred 
1425 to in subsections (a) and (b) of section 27 and for the particular circumstances in which a 
1426 controller or a processor is required to notify the personal data breach; 
1427  (iii) as to the circumstances in which a personal data breach is likely to result in a high 
1428 risk to the rights and freedoms of the natural persons referred to in subsection (a) of section 28; 
1429  (iv) for the purpose of further specifying the criteria and requirements for personal data 
1430 transfers based on binding corporate rules adhered to by controllers and binding corporate rules 
1431 adhered to by processors and on further necessary requirements to ensure the protection of 
1432 personal data of the data subjects concerned referred to in section 41; and 
1433  (v) for the purpose of further specifying the criteria and requirements for the personal 
1434 data transfers on the basis of subsection (a) of section 43.  
1435  (c) The attorney general shall, on the attorney general’s own initiative or, where relevant, 
1436 at the request of the general court, review the practical application of the guidelines, 
1437 recommendations and best practices. 
1438  (d) Where the general court requests advice from the attorney general, the general court 
1439 may indicate a time limit, taking into account the urgency of the matter. 
1440  (e) The attorney general shall forward the attorney general’s opinions, guidelines, 
1441 recommendations, and best practices to the general court and make the opinions, guidelines, 
1442 recommendations and best practices public on the attorney general’s website. 

71 of 81 1443  (f) The attorney general shall, where appropriate, consult interested parties and give 
1444 interested parties the opportunity to comment within a reasonable period. The attorney general 
1445 shall publish the results of the consultation procedure publicly on the attorney general’s website. 
1446  Section 50. In addition to the report on activities described in subsection (d) of section 
1447 46, the attorney general shall annually compile a report regarding the protection of natural 
1448 persons with regard to processing in the commonwealth and, where relevant, foreign 
1449 destinations. The reports shall include a review of the practical application of the guidelines, 
1450 recommendations and best practices referred to in subsection (b) of section 49. The reports shall 
1451 be transmitted to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and the joint committee 
1452 on advanced information technology, the internet and cybersecurity. The attorney general shall 
1453 make the reports available to the public on the attorney general’s website. 
1454  Section 51. Without prejudice to any other administrative or judicial remedy, every data 
1455 subject shall have the right to lodge a complaint with the attorney general, in particular if the data 
1456 subject lives or works in the commonwealth or the alleged infringement took place in the 
1457 commonwealth, if the data subject considers that the processing of personal data relating to the 
1458 data subject infringes this chapter. The attorney general shall inform the complainant on the 
1459 progress and the outcome of the complaint including the possibility of a judicial remedy pursuant 
1460 to section 52. 
1461  Section 52. Without prejudice to any other administrative or non-judicial remedy: 
1462  (i) each natural or legal person shall have the right to an effective judicial remedy against 
1463 a legally binding decision of the attorney general concerning the natural or legal person; and 

72 of 81 1464  (ii) each data subject shall have the right to a an effective judicial remedy where the 
1465 attorney general does not handle a complaint or does not inform the data subject within 3 months 
1466 on the progress or outcome of the complaint lodged pursuant to section 51. 
1467  Proceedings against the attorney general shall be brought before the superior court. 
1468 Where proceedings are brought against an opinion or decision of the attorney general, the 
1469 attorney general shall forward that opinion or decision to the court. 
1470  Section 53. Without prejudice to any available administrative or non-judicial remedy, 
1471 including the right to lodge a complaint with the attorney general pursuant to section 51, each 
1472 data subject shall have the right to an effective judicial remedy where the data subject considers 
1473 that the data subject’s rights under this chapter have been infringed as a result of the processing 
1474 of the data subject’s personal data in non-compliance with this chapter. Proceedings against a 
1475 controller or a processor shall be brought before the superior court. 
1476  Section 54. (a) A data subject shall have the right to mandate a not-for-profit body, 
1477 organization or association to lodge a complaint on behalf of the data subject, to exercise the 
1478 rights referred to in sections 51 to 53, inclusive, on behalf of the data subject and to exercise the 
1479 right to receive compensation referred to in section 55 on behalf of the data subject; provided, 
1480 that the body, organization or association: (i) has been properly constituted in accordance with 
1481 state or federal law; (ii) has statutory objectives in the public interest; and (iii) is active in the 
1482 field of the protection of data subjects' rights and freedoms with regard to the protection of their 
1483 personal data. 
1484  (b) Any body, organization or association referred to in subsection (a), independently of a 
1485 data subject's mandate, has the right to lodge a complaint with the attorney general pursuant to 

73 of 81 1486 section 51 and to exercise the rights referred to in sections 52 and 53 if the body, organization or 
1487 association considers that the rights of a data subject pursuant this chapter have been infringed as 
1488 a result of the processing. 
1489  Section 55.  (a) Any person who has suffered material or non-material damage as a result 
1490 of an infringement of this chapter shall have the right to receive compensation from the 
1491 controller or processor for the damage suffered. 
1492  (b) Any controller involved in processing shall be liable for the damage caused by 
1493 processing which infringes this chapter. A processor shall be liable for the damage caused by 
1494 processing only where it has not complied with obligations of this chapter specifically directed to 
1495 processors or where it has acted outside or contrary to lawful instructions of the controller. 
1496  (c) A controller or processor shall be exempt from liability as specified in subsection (b) 
1497 if the controller or processor proves that the controller or processor is not in any way responsible 
1498 for the event giving rise to the damage. 
1499  (d) Where more than 1 controller or processor, or both a controller and a processor, are 
1500 involved in the same processing and where the controller and processor are responsible for any 
1501 damage caused by processing, each controller or processor shall be held liable for the entire 
1502 damage in order to ensure effective compensation of the data subject. Where a controller or 
1503 processor has paid full compensation for the damage suffered, that controller or processor shall 
1504 be entitled to claim back from the other controllers or processors involved in the same processing 
1505 that part of the compensation corresponding to their part of responsibility for the damage, in 
1506 accordance with the conditions set out in subsection (b). 

74 of 81 1507  (e) Court proceedings for exercising the right to receive compensation shall be brought 
1508 before the superior court.  
1509  Section 56.  (a) The attorney general shall ensure that the imposition of administrative 
1510 fines pursuant to this section in respect of infringements of this chapter referred to in subsections 
1511 (d) to (f), inclusive, shall in each individual case be effective, proportionate and dissuasive. 
1512  (b) Administrative fines shall, depending on the circumstances of each individual case, be 
1513 imposed in addition to, or instead of, measures referred to in subsections (vii) to (xiv), inclusive 
1514 and (xvi) of section 46. When deciding whether to impose an administrative fine and deciding on 
1515 the amount of the administrative fine in each individual case due regard shall be given to: 
1516  (i) the nature, gravity and duration of the infringement taking into account the nature 
1517 scope or purpose of the processing concerned as well as the number of data subjects affected and 
1518 the level of damage suffered by the data subjects; 
1519  (ii) the intentional or negligent character of the infringement; 
1520  (iii) any action taken by the controller or processor to mitigate the damage suffered by 
1521 data subjects; 
1522  (iv) the degree of responsibility of the controller or processor taking into account 
1523 technical and organizational measures implemented by them pursuant to sections 19 and 26; 
1524  (v) any relevant previous infringements by the controller or processor; 
1525  (vi) the degree of cooperation with the attorney general, in order to remedy the 
1526 infringement and mitigate the possible adverse effects of the infringement; 

75 of 81 1527  (vii) the categories of personal data affected by the infringement; 
1528  (viii) the manner in which the infringement became known to the attorney general, in 
1529 particular whether, and if so to what extent, the controller or processor notified the infringement; 
1530  (ix) where measures referred to in clauses (vii) to (xvi) of subsection (a) of section 46 
1531 have previously been ordered against the controller or processor concerned with regard to the 
1532 same subject-matter, compliance with those measures; 
1533  (x) adherence to approved codes of conduct pursuant to section 34 or approved 
1534 certification mechanisms pursuant to section 36; and 
1535  (xi) any other aggravating or mitigating factor applicable to the circumstances of the case, 
1536 such as financial benefits gained, or losses avoided, directly or indirectly, from the infringement. 
1537  (c) If a controller or processor intentionally or negligently, for the same or linked 
1538 processing operations, infringes several provisions of this chapter, the total amount of the 
1539 administrative fine shall not exceed the amount specified for the gravest infringement. 
1540  (d) Infringements of the following provisions shall, in accordance with subsection (b), be 
1541 subject to administrative fines up to $10,000,000, or in the case of an undertaking, up to 2 per 
1542 cent of the total worldwide annual turnover of the preceding financial year, whichever is higher: 
1543  (i) the obligations of the controller and the processor pursuant to subsection (e) of section 
1544 5, subsection (e) of section 6, sections 19 to 33, inclusive, and sections 36 and 37; 
1545  (ii) the obligations of the certification body pursuant to sections 36 and 37; or 
1546  (iii) the obligations of the monitoring body pursuant to subsection(c) of section 35. 

76 of 81 1547  (e) Infringements of the following provisions shall, in accordance with subsection (b), be 
1548 subject to administrative fines up to $20,000,000, or in the case of an undertaking, up to 4 per 
1549 cent of the total worldwide annual turnover of the preceding financial year, whichever is higher: 
1550  (i) the basic principles for processing, including conditions for consent, pursuant to 
1551 sections 3 and 4, subsections (a) to (d), inclusive, of section 5, and subsections (a) to (c), 
1552 inclusive, of section 6; 
1553  (ii) the data subjects' rights pursuant to sections 7 to 17, inclusive; 
1554  (iii) the transfers of personal data to a recipient in a foreign destination pursuant to 
1555 sections 38 to 43, inclusive; 
1556  (iv) any obligations pursuant to general or special law adopted pursuant to sections 58 to 
1557 64, inclusive; 
1558  (v) non-compliance with an order or a temporary or definitive limitation on processing or 
1559 the suspension of data flows by the attorney general pursuant to clauses (vii) to (xvi), inclusive, 
1560 of subsection (a) of section 46 or failure to provide access in violation of clauses (i) to (vi), 
1561 inclusive, of said subsection (a) of said section 46. 
1562  (f) Non-compliance with an order by the attorney general as referred to in clauses (vii) to 
1563 (xvi), inclusive, of subsection (a) of section 46  shall, in accordance with subsection (b), be 
1564 subject to administrative fines up to $20,000,000 , or in the case of an undertaking, up to 4 per 
1565 cent of the total worldwide annual turnover of the preceding financial year, whichever is higher. 
1566  (g) Without prejudice to the corrective powers of the attorney general as referred to in 
1567 clauses (vii) to (xvi), inclusive, of subsection (a) of section 46, the general court may enact 

77 of 81 1568 general and special laws providing rules on whether and to what extent administrative fines may 
1569 be imposed on public authorities and bodies. 
1570  (h) The exercise by the attorney general of powers pursuant to this section shall be 
1571 subject to appropriate procedural safeguards in accordance with state and federal law, including 
1572 effective judicial remedy and due process. 
1573  Section 57. The general court may enact general and special laws providing rules on 
1574 other penalties applicable to infringements of this chapter, in particular for infringements that are 
1575 not subject to administrative fines pursuant to section 56, and shall take all measures necessary to 
1576 ensure that they are implemented. The penalties shall be effective, proportionate and dissuasive. 
1577  Section 58. (a) The general court shall enact general or special laws to reconcile the right 
1578 to the protection of personal data pursuant to this chapter with the right to freedom of expression 
1579 and information, including processing for journalistic purposes and the purposes of academic, 
1580 artistic or literary expression. 
1581  (b) For processing carried out for journalistic purposes or the purpose of academic artistic 
1582 or literary expression, the general court shall enact general or special laws that provide for 
1583 exemptions or derogations from sections 4 to 50, inclusive, and sections 59 to 64 if exemptions 
1584 or derogations are necessary to reconcile the right to the protection of personal data with the 
1585 freedom of expression and information. 
1586  Section 59. Personal data in official documents held by a public authority or a public 
1587 body or a private body for the performance of a task carried out in the public interest may be 
1588 disclosed by the authority or body in accordance with  general, special or federal law in order to 

78 of 81 1589 reconcile public access to official documents with the right to the protection of personal data 
1590 pursuant to this chapter. 
1591  Section 60. The attorney general may further determine the specific conditions for the 
1592 processing of a social security number, driver’s license number or any other identifier of general 
1593 application. In that case, the social security number, driver’s license number or other identifier of 
1594 general application shall be used only under appropriate safeguards for the rights and freedoms 
1595 of the data subject pursuant to this chapter. 
1596  Section 61. The general court may, by law or by collective agreements, provide for more 
1597 specific rules to ensure the protection of the rights and freedoms in respect of the processing of 
1598 employees' personal data in the employment context, in particular for the purposes of: 
1599 (i)recruitment; (ii) the performance of the contract of employment, including discharge of 
1600 obligations laid down by law or by collective agreements, management, planning and 
1601 organization of work; (iii) equality and diversity in the workplace; (iv) health and safety at work; 
1602 (v) protection of employer's or customer's property; (vi) the exercise and enjoyment, on an 
1603 individual or collective basis, of rights and benefits related to employment; and (vii) the 
1604 termination of the employment relationship. The rules shall include suitable and specific 
1605 measures to safeguard the data subject's human dignity, legitimate interests and fundamental 
1606 rights, with particular regard to the transparency of processing, the transfer of personal data 
1607 within a group of undertakings, or a group of enterprises engaged in a joint economic activity 
1608 and monitoring systems at the work place. 
1609  Section 62. (a) Processing for archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or 
1610 historical research purposes or statistical purposes, shall be subject to appropriate safeguards, in 

79 of 81 1611 accordance with this chapter, for the rights and freedoms of the data subject. The safeguards 
1612 shall ensure that technical and organizational measures are in place in particular in order to 
1613 ensure respect for the principle of data minimization. The measures may include 
1614 pseudonymization; provided, that the public interest, scientific or historical research purposes or 
1615 statistical purposes can be fulfilled in with pseudonymization. Where said purposes can be 
1616 fulfilled by further processing that does not permit or no longer permits the identification of data 
1617 subjects, the purposes shall be fulfilled in that manner. 
1618  (b) Where personal data is processed for scientific or historical research purposes or 
1619 statistical purposes, general or special law may provide for derogations from the rights referred 
1620 to in sections 10, 11, 13 and 16 subject to the conditions and safeguards referred to in subsection 
1621 (a), in so far as the rights are likely to render impossible or seriously impair the achievement of 
1622 the specific purposes and the derogations are necessary for the fulfilment of those purposes. 
1623  (c) Where personal data is processed for archiving purposes in the public interest, general 
1624 or special law may provide for derogations from the rights referred to in sections 10, 11, 13, 14, 
1625 15 and 16, subject to the conditions and safeguards referred to in subsection (a), in so far as the 
1626 rights are likely to render impossible or seriously impair the achievement of the specific purposes 
1627 and the derogations are necessary for the fulfilment of those purposes. 
1628  (d) Where processing referred to in subsections (b) and (c) serves at the same time 
1629 another purpose, the derogations shall apply only to processing for the purposes referred to in  
1630 said subsections (b) and (c). 
1631  Section 63. The general court may enact general or special laws establishing specific 
1632 rules to set out the powers of the attorney general described in clauses (v) and (vi) of subsection 

80 of 81 1633 (a) of section 46 in relation to controllers or processors that are subject, pursuant to state or 
1634 federal law or rules established by national competent bodies, to an obligation of professional 
1635 secrecy or other equivalent obligations of secrecy; provided, that the rules are necessary and 
1636 proportionate to reconcile the right of the protection of personal data with the obligation of 
1637 secrecy. The rules shall apply only with regard to personal data which the controller or processor 
1638 has received as a result of or has obtained in an activity covered by that obligation of secrecy. 
1639  Section 64. Churches and religious associations or communities that apply 
1640 comprehensive rules relating to the protection of natural persons with regard to processing may 
1641 continue to apply said rules; provided, that the rules are brought into line with this chapter; and, 
1642 provided further, that the churches and religious associations or communities shall be subject to 
1643 the supervision of the attorney general.  
1644  Section 65. (a) Every 4 years, the attorney general shall submit a report on the evaluation 
1645 and review of this chapter to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and the 
1646 joint committee on advanced information technology, the internet and cybersecurity. The 
1647 attorney general shall make the reports available to the public on the attorney general’s website. 
1648 In evaluating and reviewing this chapter, the attorney general shall examine, in particular, the 
1649 application and functioning of sections 38 to 44 regarding the transfer of personal data to foreign 
1650 destinations, with particular regard to decisions adopted pursuant to subsection (c) of section 39. 
1651 The attorney general shall take into account the positions and findings of state agencies and other 
1652 relevant bodies or sources. The attorney general shall, if necessary, submit drafts of legislation to 
1653 amend this chapter, in particular taking into account of developments in information technology 
1654 and in the light of the state of progress in the information society. 

81 of 81 1655  (b) The attorney general shall, if appropriate, submit legislative proposals with a view to 
1656 amending other general or special laws on the protection of personal data, in order to ensure 
1657 uniform and consistent protection of natural persons with regard to processing; including, but not 
1658 limited to, the rules relating to the protection of natural persons with regard to processing by 
1659 state institutions, bodies, offices and agencies and the free movement of data. 
1660  SECTION 2. Notwithstanding chapter 93M of the General Laws, agreements involving 
1661 the transfer of personal data to foreign destinations which were in place prior to the effective date 
1662 of this act, and which comply with state and federal law as applicable prior to the effective date 
1663 of this act, shall remain in force until amended, replaced or revoked.